{"E. coli enteritis": {"Symptoms": ["Fever", "Gas", "Loss of appetite", "Stomach cramping", "Vomiting (rare) ", "Bruises that happen easily", "Pale skin", "Red or bloody urine", "Reduced amount of urine"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam. A stool culture can be done to check for disease-causing E.coli.", "description": "E. coli enteritis is swelling (inflammation) of the small intestine from Escherichia coli (E. coli) bacteria. It is the most common cause of travelers' diarrhea.", "Causes": "E. coli is a type of bacteria that lives in the intestines of humans and animals. Most of the time, it does not cause any problems. However, certain types (or strains) of E. coli can cause food poisoning. One strain (E. coli O157:H7) can cause a severe case of food poisoning.Bacteria may get into your food in different ways:Meat or poultry may come into contact with normal bacteria from the intestines of an animal while it is being processed., Water used during growing or shipping may contain animal or human waste., Food may be handled in an unsafe way during transport or storage., Unsafe food handling or preparation may occur in grocery stores, restaurants, or homes. . Food poisoning can occur after eating or drinking:Food prepared by a person who did not wash hands well, Food prepared using unclean cooking utensils, cutting boards, or other tools, Dairy products or food containing mayonnaise (such as coleslaw or potato salad) that have been out of the refrigerator too long, Frozen or refrigerated foods that are not stored at the proper temperature or are not properly reheated, Fish or oysters, Raw fruits or vegetables that have not been washed well, Raw vegetable or fruit juices and dairy products, Undercooked meats or eggs, Water from a well or stream, or city or town water that has not been treated . Although not common, E. coli can be spread from one person to another. This may happen when someone does not wash his or her hands after a bowel movement and then touches other objects or someone else's hands. ", "Treatment": "Most of the time, you will recover from the most common types of E. coli infection within a couple of days. The goal of treatment is to make you feel better and avoid dehydration. Getting enough fluids and learning what to eat will help keep you or your child comfortable.You may need to:Manage the diarrhea, Control nausea and vomiting, Get plenty of rest . You can drink oral rehydration mixtures to replace fluids and minerals lost through vomiting and diarrhea. Oral rehydration powder can be purchased from a pharmacy. Be sure to mix the powder in safe water.You can make your own rehydration mixture by dissolving \u00bd teaspoon\u00a0of salt, \u00bd teaspoon of baking soda and 4 tablespoons of\u00a0sugar in 4 \u00bc cups (1 liter) of water. \r\n You may need to get fluids through a vein (IV) if you have diarrhea or vomiting and cannot drink or keep enough fluids in your body. You will need to go to your health care provider's office or the emergency room. If you take diuretics (water pills), talk to your health care provider. You may need to stop taking the diuretic while you have diarrhea. Never stop or change medicines without first talking to your health care provider. You can buy medicines at the drugstore that can help stop or slow diarrhea. Do not use these medicines without talking to your health care provider if you have bloody diarrhea or a fever. Do not give these medicines to children. "}, "Eye emergencies": {"Symptoms": ["Bleeding or other discharge from or around the eye", "Bruising", "Decreased vision", "Double vision", "Eye pain", "Headache", "Itchy eyes", "Loss of vision, total or partial, one eye or both\u00a0\r\n ", "Pupils of unequal size", "Redness -- bloodshot appearance", "Sensation of something in the eye", "Sensitivity to light", "Stinging or burning in the eye"], "Causes": "\r\nA black eye is usually caused by direct trauma to the eye or face. The bruise is caused by bleeding under the skin. The tissue around the eye turns black and blue, gradually becoming purple, green, and yellow over several days. The abnormal color disappears within 2 weeks. Swelling of the eyelid and tissue around the eye may also occur., Certain types of skull fractures can cause bruising around the eyes, even without direct injury to the eye., Sometimes, serious damage to the eye itself occurs from the pressure of a swollen eyelid or face. A hyphema is blood in the front area of the eye. Trauma is a common cause and is often due to a direct hit to the eye from a ball.. Chemical injuries A chemical injury to the eye can be caused by a work-related accident. It can also be caused by common household products, such as cleaning solutions, garden chemicals, solvents, or many other types of chemicals. Fumes and aerosols can also cause chemical burns., With acid burns, the haze on the cornea often clears and there is a good chance of recovery., Alkaline substances -- such as lime, lye, drain cleaners, and sodium hydroxide found in refrigeration equipment -- may cause permanent damage to the cornea., It is important to flush out the eye with clean water or salt water (saline) while seeking urgent medical care.. Eyelid and eye cutsAn injury to the eyelid may be a sign of severe injury to the eye itself. . Foreign object in the eye and corneal injuriesThe cornea is the clear (transparent) tissue covering the front of the eye. , Dust, sand, and other debris can easily enter the eye. Persistent pain, sensitivity to light, and redness are signs that treatment is needed., A foreign body in the eye may threaten vision if the object enters the eye itself or damages the cornea or lens. Foreign bodies thrown at high speed by machining, grinding, or hammering metal have the highest risk of injuring the eye. . ", "description": "Eye emergencies include cuts, scratches, objects in the eye, burns, chemical exposure, and blunt injuries to the eye or eyelid. Certain eye infections and other medical conditions, such as blood clots or glaucoma, may also need prompt medical care. Since the eye is easily damaged, any of these conditions can lead to vision loss if untreated.", "Prevention": "Supervise children carefully. Teach them how to be safe.Always wear protective eye gear when: Using power tools, hammers, or other striking tools, Working with toxic chemicals, Cycling or participating in sports where there is a high likelihood of injury to the eye, such as indoor racket sports. "}, "Encopresis": {"description": "If a child over the age of 4 has been toilet trained and then passes stool and soils clothes again, this is called encopresis. The child may or may not be doing this on purpose.", "Possible Complications": "If encopresis is not treated, the child may have low self-esteem and problems making and keeping friends., If encopresis is not corrected, the child may develop chronic constipation.. ", "Symptoms": ["Being unable\u00a0to hold stool before getting to a toilet (bowel incontinence)", "Passing stool in inappropriate places (as in the child's clothes)", "Keeping bowel movements a secret", "Having constipation and hard stools", "Sometimes passing a very large stool that almost blocks the toilet "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor may feel the stool stuck in the child\u2019s rectum (fecal impaction). An x-ray of the child\u2019s belly may show impacted stool in the colon.", "Treatment": "The goal is to:Prevent constipation, Keep good bowel habits . It is best for parents to support, rather than criticize or discourage the child.Treatments may include any of the following:Giving the child laxatives or enemas to remove dry, hard stool., Giving the child\u00a0stool softeners., Having the child eat a diet high in fiber (fruits, vegetables, whole grains) and drink plenty of fluids to keep the stools soft and comfortable., Taking flavored mineral oil for a short period of time. This is only a short-term treatment because mineral oil interferes with the absorption of calcium and vitamin D., Seeing a pediatric gastroenterologist when these treatments aren't enough. The doctor\u00a0may use biofeedback, or teach the parents and child how to manage encopresis., Seeing a\u00a0psychotherapist\u00a0to help the child deal with associated shame, guilt, or loss of self-esteem. . For encopresis without constipation, the child may need a psychiatric evaluation\u00a0to find the cause.", "Causes": "The child usually has constipation. The stool is hard, dry, and stuck in the colon (called fecal impaction). The child then passes only wet or almost liquid stool that flows around the hard stool. It may leak out during the day or night. Other causes may include:Not toilet training the child\u00a0, Starting\u00a0toilet training when the child was too young, Emotional problems, like oppositional defiant disorder, Conduct disorder . Whatever the cause, the child may feel shame, guilt, or low self-esteem, and may hide signs of encopresis.Factors that may increase the risk\u00a0of encopresis:Being male, Chronic constipation, Low socioeconomic status . ", "Prevention": "Toilet train in a positive way when the child is the right age.If your child shows signs of constipation, such as dry, hard, or infrequent stools, ask your doctor how to treat it."}, "Ear infection - acute": {"description": "An acute ear infection starts over a short period of time and is painful. Ear infections that last a long time or come and go are called chronic ear infections.", "Possible Complications": "Rarely, a more serious infection may develop, such asMastoiditis (an infection of the bones around the skull), Meningitis (an infection of the brain) . ", "Symptoms": ["Ear pain or earache", "Fullness in the ear", "Feeling of general illness", "Vomiting", "Diarrhea", "Hearing loss in the affected ear "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will look inside the ears using an instrument called an otoscope. This may show:Areas of dullness or redness, Air bubbles or fluid behind the eardrum, Bloody fluid or pus inside the middle ear, A hole (perforation) in the eardrum . The health care provider might recommend a hearing test if the person has a history of ear infections.", "Treatment": "Some ear infections will safely clear up on their own without antibiotics. Often, treating the pain and allowing the body time to heal itself is all that is needed:Apply a warm cloth or warm water bottle to the affected ear., Use over-the-counter pain relief drops for ears, or ask the doctor about prescription ear drops to relieve pain., Take over-the-counter medications for pain or fever, such as ibuprofen or acetaminophen. Do NOT give aspirin to children. . All children younger than 6 months with a fever or symptoms should see the doctor. Children who are older than 6 months may be watched at home if they do NOT have:A fever higher than 102\u00b0F (38.9\u00b0C), More severe pain or other symptoms, Other medical problems. If there is no improvement or if symptoms get worse, schedule an appointment with your health care provider to determine whether antibiotics are needed.ANTIBIOTICSA virus or bacteria can cause ear infections. Antibiotics will not help an infection that is caused by a virus. Many health care providers no longer prescribe antibiotics for every ear infection. However, all children younger than 6 months with an ear infection are treated with antibiotics.Your health care provider is more likely to prescribe antibiotics if your child:Is under age 2, Has a fever, Appears sick, Does not improve in 24 to 48 hours. If antibiotics are prescribed, it is important to take them every day and to take all of the medicine. Do NOT stop the medicine when symptoms go away. If the antibiotics do not seem to be working within 48 to 72 hours, contact your doctor. You may need to switch to a different antibiotic.Side effects of antibiotics may include nausea, vomiting, and diarrhea. Although rare, serious allergic reactions may also occur.Some children have repeat ear infections that seem to go away between episodes. They may receive a smaller, daily dose of antibiotics to prevent new infections.SURGERYIf an infection does not go away with the usual medical treatment, or if a child has many ear infections over a short period of time, the doctor may recommend ear tubes.A tiny tube is inserted into the eardrum, keeping open a small hole that allows air to get in so fluids can drain more easily. , Usually the tubes fall out by themselves. Those that don't fall out may be removed in your doctor's office.. If the adenoids are enlarged, removing them with surgery may be considered if ear infections continue to occur. Removing tonsils does not seem to help prevent ear infections.", "Causes": "The eustachian tube runs from the middle of each ear to the back of the throat. Normally, this tube drains fluid that is made in the middle ear. If this tube becomes blocked, fluid can build up. This can lead to infection.Ear infections are common in infants and children, because the eustachian tubes become clogged easily., Ear infections may also occur in adults, although they are less common than in children. . Anything that causes the eustachian tubes to become swollen or blocked causes more fluid to build up in the middle ear behind the eardrum. Some causes are:Allergies, Colds and sinus infections, Excess mucus and saliva produced during teething, Infected or overgrown adenoids (lymph tissue in the upper part of the throat), Tobacco smoke . Ear infections are also more likely in children who spend a lot of time drinking from a sippy cup or bottle while lying on their back. However, getting water in the ears will not cause an acute ear infection, unless the eardrum has a hole in it.Acute ear infections occur most often in the winter. You cannot catch an ear infection from someone else, but a cold may spread among children and cause some of them to get ear infections.Risk factors for acute ear infections include:Attending day care (especially those with more than 6 children), Changes in altitude or climate, Cold climate, Exposure to smoke, Family history of ear infections, Not being breastfed, Pacifier use, Recent ear infection, Recent illness of any type (because illness lowers the body's resistance to infection) . ", "Prevention": "You can reduce your child's risk of ear infections with the following practices:Wash hands and toys often., If possible, choose a day care that has 6 or fewer children. This can reduce your child's chances of getting a cold or other infection, and lead to fewer ear infections., Avoid pacifiers., Breastfeed -- this makes a child much less prone to ear infections. If you are bottle feeding, hold your infant in an upright, seated position., Do not expose your child to secondhand smoke., Make sure your child's immunizations are up to date. The pneumococcal vaccine prevents infections from the bacteria that most commonly cause acute ear infections and many respiratory infections., Avoid overusing antibiotics. Overusing antibiotics can lead to antibiotic resistance. . "}, "Endocardial cushion defect": {"description": "Endocardial cushion defect (ECD) is an abnormal heart condition. The walls separating all four chambers of the heart are poorly formed or absent. It is a congenital heart disease, which means it is present from birth.", "Symptoms": ["Baby tires easily", "Bluish skin color (the lips may also be blue)", "Failure to gain weight and grow", "Frequent pneumonia", "Lack of appetite", "Pale skin (pallor)", "Rapid breathing", "Rapid heartbeat", "Sweating", "Swollen legs or abdomen (rare in children)", "Trouble breathing, especially during feeding"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs of ECD may include:An abnormal electrocardiogram (ECG), An enlarged heart, Heart murmur. Children with partial ECD, who have only a small VSD and normal valves, may not have signs or symptoms of the disorder during childhood.Tests to diagnose ECD include:Ultrasound of the heart (echocardiogram) to see blood flow, An electrocardiogram (ECG), which measures the electrical activity in the heart, Chest x-ray, which may show an enlarged heart, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the heart, which provides a detailed image of the heart through the use of powerful magnets, Cardiac catheterization (in some cases), a procedure in which a thin tube (catheter) is placed into the heart to see blood flow and take accurate measurements of blood pressure and oxygen levels. ", "Causes": "Endocardial cushion defect occurs while a baby is still growing in the womb. The endocardial cushions are two thicker areas that go on to develop into the wall (septum) that separates the four chambers of the heart. They also form the mitral and tricuspid valves. These are the valves that separate the atria (top collecting chambers) from the ventricles (bottom pumping chambers).The lack of separation between the two sides of the heart causes several problems:Increased blood pressure in the lungs. In people with this condition, blood flows through the abnormal openings from the left to the right side of the heart, then to the lungs. More blood flow into the lungs makes the blood pressure in the lungs rise., Irritation and swelling. This is caused by increased blood flow into the lungs., Heart failure. The extra effort needed to pump makes the heart work harder than normal. The heart muscle may enlarge and weaken., Cyanosis. As the blood pressure increases in the lungs, blood flow starts to move from the right side of the heart to the left. The oxygen-poor blood mixes with the oxygen-rich blood. As a result, blood with less oxygen than usual is pumped out to the body. This causes cyanosis, or bluish coloring of the skin. . \u00a0 There are two types of ECD:Complete ECD. This condition involves an atrial septal defect (ASD) and a ventricular septal defect (VSD). People with a complete ECD have only one large heart valve (common AV valve) instead of two distinct valves (mitral and tricuspid)., Partial (or incomplete) ECD. In this condition, only an ASD, or an AD and VSD are present. There are two distinct valves, but one of them (the mitral valve) is often abnormal with an opening (\"cleft\") in it. This defect can leak blood back through the valve. . ECD is strongly linked to Down syndrome. Several gene changes are also connected to ECD. However, the exact cause of ECD is unknown.ECD may be associated with other congenital heart defects, such as:Double outlet right ventricle, Single ventricle, Transposition of the great vessels, Tetralogy of Fallot. ", "Prevention": "ECD is linked with several genetic abnormalities. Couples with a family history of ECD may wish to seek genetic counseling before becoming pregnant.", "Treatment": "Surgery is needed to close the holes between the heart chambers, and to create distinct tricuspid and mitral valves. The timing of the surgery depends on the child's condition and the severity of the ECD. It can often be done when the baby is 3 - 6 months old. Correcting an ECD may require more than one surgery.Your doctor may prescribe medicine before surgery if the ECD has made your baby very sick. The medicines will help the child gain weight and strength before surgery. Drugs often used include:Diuretics (water pills), Drugs that make the heart contract more forcefully (inotropic agents), such as digoxin . Surgery for a complete ECD should be done in the baby's first year of life. Otherwise, lung damage that may not be able to be reversed can occur. Babies with Down syndrome tend to develop lung disease earlier. Therefore, early surgery is very important for these babies."}, "Enlarged adenoids": {"Symptoms": ["Bad breath", "Cracked lips", "Dry mouth", "Persistent runny nose or nasal congestion", "Be restless while sleeping", "Snore a lot", "Have episodes of not breathing during sleep (sleep apnea)"], "Exams and Tests": "The adenoids cannot be seen by looking in the mouth directly. The health care provider can see them by using a special mirror in the mouth your mouth or by inserting a flexible tube (called an endoscope) placed through the nose.Tests may include:X-ray of the throat or neck, Sleep study . ", "description": "Enlarged adenoids means this tissue is swollen.", "Causes": "Enlarged adenoids may be normal. They may grow bigger when the baby grows in the womb. The adenoids help the body prevent or fight infections by removing bacteria and germs.Infections can cause the adenoids to become swollen. The adenoids may stay enlarged even when you are not sick.", "Treatment": "Many people with enlarged adenoids have few or no symptoms and do not need treatment. Adenoids shrink as a child grows older.The health care provider may prescribe antibiotics or nasal steroid sprays if an infection develops.Surgery to remove the adenoids (adenoidectomy) may be done if the symptoms are severe or persistent."}, "Endocarditis": {"description": "Endocarditis is inflammation of the inside lining of the heart chambers and heart valves (endocardium).", "Symptoms": ["Be present for days before any other symptoms appear", "Come and go, or be more noticeable at nighttime", "Small areas of bleeding under the nails (splinter hemorrhages)\r\n\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 ", "Red, painless skin spots on the palms and soles (Janeway lesions)", "Red, painful nodes in the pads of the fingers and toes (Osler's nodes)", "Shortness of breath with activity", "Swelling of feet, legs, abdomen"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may detect a new heart murmur, or a change in a past heart murmur. An eye exam may show bleeding in the retina and a\u00a0central area of clearing. This is known as Roth's spots. There may be small, pinpoint areas of bleeding on the surface of the eye or the eyelids.\u00a0Tests that may be done include:Blood culture -- helps identify the bacteria or fungus that is causing the infection\r\n , Complete blood count (CBC),\u00a0C-reactive protein (CRP), or erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), A routine echocardiogram or a\u00a0transesophageal echocardiogram provides a closer look at the heart valves\r\n . ", "Causes": "Endocarditis can involve the heart muscle, heart valves, or lining of the heart. Most people who develop endocarditis have a:Birth defect of the heart, Damaged or abnormal heart valve, History of endocarditis, New heart valve after surgery. Endocarditis begins when different germs enter the bloodstream and then travel to the heart.Bacterial infection is the most common cause of endocarditis., Endocarditis can also be caused by fungi, such as Candida., In some cases, no cause can be found.. Germs are most likely to enter the bloodstream during:Central venous access lines, Injection drug use, from the use of unclean (unsterile) needles, Recent dental surgery, Other surgeries or minor procedures to the breathing tract, urinary tract, infected skin, or bones\u00a0and muscles. ", "Prevention": "The American Heart Association recommends preventive antibiotics for people at risk for infectious endocarditis, such as those with:Certain birth defects of the heart, Heart transplant and valve problems, Man-made (prosthetic) heart valves, Past history of endocarditis. These patients should receive antibiotics when they have:Dental procedures that are likely to cause bleeding, Procedures involving the breathing tract, Procedures involving the urinary tract system, Procedures involving the digestive tract, Procedures on skin infections and soft tissue infections.  \r\n\u00a0 \r\n", "Treatment": "You may need to be hospitalized at first to receive antibiotics through a vein (IV or intravenously). Blood cultures and tests will help your health care provider choose the best antibiotic. You will then need long-term antibiotic therapy. Patients usually\u00a0need therapy for 4-6 weeks to fully remove all\u00a0the bacteria from the heart chambers and valves., Antibiotic treatments that are started in the hospital will need to be continued at home.. Surgery to replace the heart valve is usually needed when:The infection is breaking off in little pieces, resulting in strokes, The person develops heart failure as a result of damaged heart valves, There is evidence of more severe organ damage. "}, "Empty sella syndrome": {"description": "Empty sella syndrome is a condition in which the pituitary gland shrinks or becomes flattened.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of primary empty sella syndrome include mild hyperprolactinemia.Complications of secondary empty sella syndrome are related to the cause of pituitary gland disease or to the effects of too little pituitary hormone.", "Symptoms": ["Erectile dysfunction (impotence)", "Headaches", "Irregular or absent menstruation", "Low sexual desire (low libido)", "Fatigue, low energy", "Nipple discharge"], "Exams and Tests": "Primary empty sella syndrome is most often discovered during an MRI or CT scan of the head and brain. Pituitary function is usually normal.The health care provider may test the pituitary to make sure that the gland is working normally.Sometimes tests for high pressure in the brain will be done, such as:Examination of the retina by an ophthalmologist, Lumbar puncture (spinal tap) . ", "Treatment": "For primary empty sella syndrome:There is no treatment if pituitary function is normal., Medicines may be prescribed to treat any abnormal hormone levels.. For secondary empty sella syndrome, treatment involves replacing the hormones that are lacking.In some cases, surgery is needed to repair the sella turcica.", "Causes": "The pituitary gland is a small gland located at the base of the brain. It sits in a saddle-like compartment in the skull called the sella turcica. In Latin, it means Turkish saddle.When the pituitary gland shrinks or becomes flattened, it cannot be seen on an\u00a0MRI scan. This makes the pituitary gland look like an \"empty sella.\" But the sella is not actually empty. It is often filled with cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). CSF is fluid that surrounds the brain and spinal cord. With empty sella syndrome, CSF has leaked into the sella turcica, putting pressure on the pituitary gland. This causes the gland to shrink or flatten.Primary empty sella syndrome occurs when one of the layers (arachnoid) covering the outside of the brain bulges down into the sella and presses on the pituitary.Secondary empty sella syndrome occurs when the sella is empty because the pituitary gland has been damaged by:A tumor, Radiation therapy, Surgery . Empty sella syndrome may be seen in a condition called pseudotumor cerebri, which mainly affects young, obese women.The pituitary gland makes several hormones that control other glands in the body, including the:Adrenal glands, Ovaries, Testicles, Thyroid . A problem with the pituitary gland can lead to problems with any of the above glands and abnormal hormone levels of these glands."}, "Eugenol oil overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing - shallow", "Breathing - rapid ", "Coughing up blood", "Blood in the urine", "No urine output", "Pain when you urinate", "Burns in mouth and throat", "Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Liver failure (especially in children)", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Rapid heartbeat", "Coma", "Dizziness", "Seizures", "Unconsciousness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Ehrlichiosis": {"description": "Ehrlichiosis is a bacterial infection transmitted by the bite of a tick.", "Possible Complications": "Coma, Death (rare), Infection with the bacteria that cause Lyme disease, Infection with the organism that causes babesiosis, Kidney damage, Lung damage, Other organ damage, Seizure. ", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Fever", "Headache", "Muscle aches", "Nausea", "Diarrhea", "Fine pinhead-sized areas of bleeding in the skin (petechial rash)", "Flat red rash (maculopapular rash) (uncommon)", "General ill feeling (malaise) "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will do a physical exam and check your vital signs, including:Blood pressure, Heart rate, Temperature. Other tests include:Complete blood count (CBC), Granulocyte stain, Indirect fluorescent antibody test, PCR testing of blood sample. ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics (tetracycline or doxycycline) are used to treat the disease. Children should not take tetracycline by mouth until after all their permanent teeth have grown in, because it can permanently change the color of growing teeth. Doxycycline that is used for 2 weeks or less usually does not discolor a child's permanent teeth. Rifampin has also been used in patients who can not tolerate doxycycline.", "Causes": "Ehrlichiosis is caused by bacteria that belong to the family called Rickettsiae. Rickettsial bacteria cause a number of serious diseases worldwide, including Rocky Mountain spotted fever and typhus. All of these diseases are spread to humans by a tick, flea, or mite bite.Scientists first described ehrlichiosis in 1990. There are two types of the disease in the United States:Human monocytic ehrlichiosis (HME) is caused by the rickettsial bacteria Ehrlichia chaffeensis., Human granulocytic ehrlichiosis (HGE) is also called human granulocytic anaplasmosis (HGA). It is caused by the rickettsial bacteria called Anaplasma phagocytophilum.. Ehrlichia bacteria can be carried by the:American dog tick, Deer tick (Ixodes scapularis) -- which can also cause Lyme disease, Lone Star tick. In the United States, HME is found mainly in the southern central states and the Southeast. HGE is found mainly in the Northeast and upper Midwest.Risk factors for ehrlichiosis include:Living near an area with a lot of ticks, Owning a pet that may bring a tick home, Walking or playing in high grasses. ", "Prevention": "Ehrlichiosis is spread by tick bites. Preventing tick bites will prevent this, and other, tick-borne diseases. Common measures to prevent tick bites include:Avoiding dense brush and long grasses when hiking, Checking yourself for ticks and removing any that you find after being outside, Not standing under trees or bushes, Using insect repellent, Wearing clothing to cover skin. Studies suggest that a tick must be attached to your body for at least 24 hours to cause disease. Early removal will prevent infection.If you are bitten by a tick, write down the date and time the bite happened. Bring this information, along with the tick (if possible), to your doctor if you become sick."}, "Endometrial polyps": {"description": "Endometrium is the lining of the inside of the womb (uterus). Overgrowth of this lining can create polyps. Polyps are fingerlike growths that attach to the wall of the uterus. They can be as small as a sesame seed or larger than a golf ball. There may be just one or many polyps.", "Possible Complications": "Endometrial polyps may make it hard to get or stay pregnant.", "Symptoms": ["Menstrual bleeding that is not regular or predictable", "Long or heavy menstrual bleeding", "Bleeding between periods", "Bleeding from the vagina after menopause", "Trouble getting or staying pregnant (infertility)"], "Exams and Tests": "If your doctor may do these tests to find out if you have endometrial polyps:Transvaginal ultrasound, Hysteroscopy, Endometrial biopsy, Hysterosonogram: a specialized type of ultrasound in which fluid is put into the uterine cavity while an ultrasound is performed. ", "Treatment": "Most polyps should be removed because of the small possibility of cancer.Endometrial polyps are usually removed by a procedure called hysteroscopy. Sometimes, a D and C can be done to biopsy the endometrium and remove the polyp. This is less commonly used.Premenopausal women who have no symptoms and no other risk factors could consider watchful waiting. This is when your doctor continues to monitor your health, but does not give treatment unless you have symptoms or something else changes.", "Causes": "No one knows exactly why some women get endometrial polyps. They tend to grow when there is more of the hormone estrogen in the body.Most endometrial polyps are not cancerous. About 5% can be cancerous or precancerous. The chance of cancer is higher if you are postmenopausal, on Tamoxifen, or have heavy or irregular periods.These factors may increase the risk for endometrial polyps:Obesity, Tamoxifen, a treatment for breast cancer, Postmenopausal hormone replacement therapy, Family history of Lynch syndrome or Cowden syndrome (genetic conditions that run in families). ", "Prevention": "You cannot prevent endometrial polyps."}, "Esophageal atresia": {"description": "Esophageal atresia is a disorder of the digestive system in which the esophagus does not develop properly. The esophagus is the tube that normally carries food from the mouth to the stomach.", "Possible Complications": "The infant may breathe saliva and other fluids into the lungs, causing aspiration pneumonia, choking, and possibly death.Other complications may include:Feeding problems, Reflux (the repeated bringing up of food from the stomach) after surgery, Narrowing (stricture) of the esophagus due to scarring from surgery. Prematurity may complicate the condition.", "Symptoms": ["Bluish coloration to the skin (cyanosis) with attempted feedings", "Coughing, gagging, and choking with attempted feeding", "Drooling", "Poor feeding"], "Exams and Tests": "Before birth, an ultrasound performed on the pregnant mother may show too much amniotic fluid, which can be a sign of esophageal atresia or other blockage of the digestive tract.The disorder is usually detected shortly after birth when feeding is attempted and the infant coughs, chokes, and turns blue. As soon as the diagnosis is suspected, an attempt to pass a small feeding tube through the mouth or nose into the stomach should be made by a health care professional. The feeding tube will not be able to pass all the way to the stomach in a baby with esophageal atresia. An x-ray of the esophagus shows an air-filled pouch and air in the stomach and intestine. If a feeding tube has been inserted, it will appear coiled up in the upper esophagus.", "Treatment": "Esophageal atresia is considered a surgical emergency. Surgery to repair the esophagus should be done quickly after the baby is stabilized so that the lungs are not damaged and the baby can be fed.Before the surgery, the baby is not fed by mouth. Care is taken to prevent the baby from breathing secretions into the lungs.", "Causes": "Esophageal atresia is a congenital defect, which means it occurs before birth. There are several types. In most cases, the upper esophagus ends and does not connect with the lower esophagus and stomach. The top end of the lower esophagus connects to the windpipe. This connection is called a tracheoesophageal fistula (TEF). Some babies with TEF will also have other problems, such as heart or other digestive tract disorders.Other types of esophageal atresia involve narrowing of the esophagus, and may also be associated with other birth defects.Esophageal atresia occurs in about 1 out of 4,000 births."}, "Empyema": {"description": "Empyema is a collection of pus in the space between the lung and the inner surface of the chest wall (pleural space).", "Possible Complications": "Pleural thickening, Reduced lung function. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain, which worsens when you breathe in deeply (pleurisy)", "Dry cough", "Excessive sweating, especially night sweats", "Fever and chills", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Shortness of breath", "Weight loss (unintentional)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may note decreased breath sounds or an abnormal sound (friction rub) when listening to the chest with a stethoscope (auscultation).Tests may include the following:Chest x-ray, CT scan of chest, Pleural fluid analysis\u00a0, Thoracentesis. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to cure the infection. This involves\u00a0removing the collection of pus from the space between the lung and the inner surface of the chest wall. Antibiotics are prescribed to control the infection.The health care provider will place a chest tube to completely drain the pus. A surgeon may need to perform a procedure to peel away the lining of the lung (decortication) if the lung does not expand properly.", "Causes": "Empyema is usually caused by an infection that spreads from the lung. It leads to a buildup of pus in the pleural space.There can be a pint or more of infected fluid. This fluid puts pressure on the lungs.Risk factors include:Bacterial pneumonia, Chest surgery, Lung abscess, Trauma or injury to the chest. In rare cases, empyema can occur after a needle is inserted through the chest wall to draw off fluid in the pleural space for medical diagnosis or treatment (thoracentesis).", "Prevention": "Prompt and effective treatment of lung infections may prevent some cases of empyema."}, "Endometritis": {"description": "Endometritis is an inflammation or irritation of the lining of the uterus (the endometrium). It is not the same as endometriosis.", "Possible Complications": "Infertility, Pelvic peritonitis (generalized pelvic infection), Pelvic or uterine abscess formation, Septicemia, Septic shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Swelling of the abdomen", "Abnormal vaginal bleeding or discharge", "Discomfort with bowel movement (including constipation)", "Fever", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling ", "Pain in lower abdomen or pelvic region (uterine pain)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam with a pelvic exam. Your uterus and cervix may be tender and the provider may not hear bowel sounds. You may have cervical discharge.The following tests may be performed:Cultures from the cervix for chlamydia, gonorrhea, and other organisms, Endometrial biopsy, ESR (sedimentation rate), Laparoscopy, WBC (white blood count), Wet prep (microscopic exam of any discharge) . ", "Treatment": "You will need to take antibiotics to treat the infection and prevent complications. Finish all your medicine if you have been given antibiotics after a pelvic procedure. Also, go to all follow-up visits with your health care provider. You may need to be treated in the hospital if your symptoms are severe or occur after childbirth. Other treatments may involve:Fluids through a vein (by IV), Rest . Sexual partners may need to be treated if the condition is caused by a sexually transmitted infection.", "Causes": "Endometritis is caused by an infection in the uterus. It can be due to chlamydia, gonorrhea, tuberculosis, or a mix of normal vaginal bacteria. It is more likely to occur after miscarriage or childbirth. It is also more common after a long labor or C-section.The risk of endometritis is higher after having a pelvic procedure that is done through the cervix. Such procedures include:D and C, Endometrial biopsy, Hysteroscopy, Placement of an intrauterine device (IUD). Endometritis can occur at the same time as other pelvic infections. ", "Prevention": "Endometritis caused by sexually transmitted infections can be prevented by:Treating sexually transmitted infections early, Making sure sexual partners are treated in the case of a sexually transmitted infection , Following safer sex practices, such as using condoms. Women having a C-section may have antibiotics before the procedure to prevent infections."}, "Esophageal spasm": {"description": "Esophageal spasms are abnormal contractions of the muscles in the esophagus (the tube that carries food from the mouth to the stomach). These spasms do not move food effectively to the stomach.", "Possible Complications": "The condition may not respond to treatment.", "Symptoms": ["Problems swallowing or pain with swallowing", "Pain in the chest or upper abdomen "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests you may need to look for the condition include:Esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD), Esophageal manometry, Esophagogram (barium swallow x-ray) . ", "Treatment": "Nitroglycerin given under the tongue (sublingual) may help a sudden episode of esophageal spasm. Long-acting nitroglycerin and calcium channel blockers are also used for the problem.Long-term (chronic) cases are sometimes treated with low-dose antidepressants such as trazodone or nortriptyline to reduce symptoms.Rarely, severe cases may need dilation (widening) of the esophagus or surgery. to control symptoms", "Causes": "The cause of esophageal spasm is unknown. Very hot or very cold foods may trigger spasms in some people.", "Prevention": "Avoid very hot or very cold foods if you get esophageal spasms."}, "Erythema nodosum": {"Symptoms": ["Fever ", "General ill feeling (malaise)", "Joint aches", "Skin redness, inflammation, or irritation", "Swelling of the leg or other affected area"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor can diagnose this condition by looking at your skin. Tests that may be done include: Punch biopsy of a nodule., Throat culture to rule out a strep infection., Chest x-ray to rule out sarcoidosis or tuberculosis.. ", "description": "Erythema nodosum is an inflammatory disorder that involves tender, red bumps\u00a0(nodules) under the skin.", "Causes": "In about half of cases, the exact cause of erythema nodosum is unknown. Some cases may occur with infections. Some of the more common\u00a0infections are:Streptococcus (most common), Cat scratch disease, Chlamydia, Coccidioidomycosis, Hepatitis B, Histoplasmosis, Leptospirosis, Mononucleosis (EBV), Mycobacteria, Mycoplasma, Psittacosis, Syphilis, Tuberculosis, Tularemia, Yersinia. Erythema nodosum may occur with sensitivity to certain medications, including:Antibiotics including amoxicillin and other penicillins, Sulfonamides, Sulfones, Birth control pills, Progestin. Sometimes, erythema nodosum may occur during pregnancy. Other disorders linked to this condition include leukemia, lymphoma, sarcoidosis, rheumatic fever, Bechet's disease, and ulcerative colitis.The condition is more common in women than it is in men.", "Treatment": "The underlying infection, drug, or disease should be identified and treated.Treatment may include: Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) to reduce pain and swelling, Stronger anti-inflammatory medicines called steroids, taken by mouth or given as a shot. , Potassium iodide (SSKI) solution to clear up the nodules., Salicylate medications to reduce acute inflammation. , Pain medicines (analgesics), Rest, Raising the sore area (elevation), Hot or cold compresses to help reduce discomfort. "}, "ECHO virus ": {"description": "Enteric cytopathic human orphan (ECHO) viruses are a group of viruses that lead to gastrointestinal infection and skin rashes.", "Possible Complications": "ECHO viruses may cause these complications:Brain infection, Meningitis, Inflammation of the heart muscle or heart lining, Pneumonia, Upper respiratory infection . Complications vary with the site and type of infection. Heart infections may be deadly, while most other types of infection improve on their own. ", "Symptoms": ["Croup\u00a0(breathing difficulty and harsh cough)", "Mouth sores", "Skin rashes", "Sore throat "], "Exams and Tests": "Because the illness is often mild and has no specific treatment, testing for echovirus is often not done.ECHO virus can be identified from:Rectal culture, Spinal fluid culture, Stool culture, Throat culture. ", "Treatment": "ECHO virus infections almost always clear up on their own. No specific medicines are available to fight the virus. Immune system treatment called IVIG may help people with severe ECHO virus infections who have a weakened immune system.", "Causes": "Echovirus is one of several families of viruses that affect the gastrointestinal tract. Together, these are called \"enteroviruses.\" These infections are common. In the United States, they are most common in the summer and fall. You can catch the virus if you come into contact with stool contaminated by the virus, and possibly by breathing in air particles from an infected person.Serious infections with ECHO viruses are less common, but can be significant. For example, up to 1 in 5 cases of viral meningitis (inflammation of the tissue that surrounds the brain and spinal cord) is caused by an ECHO virus.", "Prevention": "No specific preventive measures are available for ECHO virus infections other than hand-washing, especially when you are in contact with sick people. Currently, no vaccines are available."}, "Ectropion": {"description": "Ectropion is the turning out of the eyelid so that the inner surface is exposed. It most often affects the lower eyelid. ", "Possible Complications": "Corneal dryness and irritation may lead to:Corneal abrasions, Corneal ulcers, Eye infections. Corneal ulcers can threaten vision.", "Symptoms": ["Dry, painful eyes", "Excess tearing of the eye (epiphora)", "Eyelid turns outward", "Long-term (chronic) conjunctivitis", "Keratitis", "Redness of the lid and white part of the eye "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will make a diagnosis by doing an exam of the eyes and eyelids. Special tests are not needed most of the time.", "Treatment": "Artificial tears (a lubricant) may ease dryness and keep the cornea moist. Surgery to tighten the muscles that hold the eyelids in place is very often effective. It may be done as outpatient surgery using medicine to numb the area (local anesthesia).", "Causes": "Ectropion is very often caused by the aging process. The connective tissue of the eyelid becomes weaker, which causes the lid to turn out so that the edge of the lower lid is no longer against the eyeball. It can also be caused by:\r\nA defect that occurs before birth (for example, in children with Down syndrome)\r\n\r\n  , Facial palsy, \r\n  Scar tissue from burns\r\n  . ", "Prevention": "Most cases are cannot be prevented. Using artificial tears or lubricating ointments may prevent injury to the cornea. "}, "Ectopic Cushing syndrome": {"description": "Other forms of Cushing syndrome include:", "Possible Complications": "The tumor may spread or return after surgery. A high cortisol level may continue.", "Symptoms": ["Round, red, and full face (moon face)", "Slow growth rate in children", "Weight gain with fat accumulation on the trunk, but fat loss from the arms, legs, and buttocks (central obesity) ", "Skin infections", "Purple marks (1/2 inch or more wide) called striae on the skin of the abdomen, thighs, and breasts", "Thin skin with easy bruising ", "Backache, which occurs with routine activities", "Bone pain or tenderness", "Collection of fat between the shoulders and above the collar bone", "Rib and spine fractures caused by thinning of the bones", "Weak muscles, especially of the hips and shoulders ", "Excess hair growth on the face, neck, chest, abdomen, and thighs", "Periods that become irregular or stop ", "Decreased or no desire for sex", "Impotence", "Mental changes, such as depression, anxiety, or changes in behavior", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Increased thirst and urination"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms. Tests that may be done include:24-hour urine sample to measure cortisol and creatinine levels, Blood tests to check ACTH, cortisol, and potassium levels, Dexamethasone suppression test, Fasting glucose, MRI and high resolution CT scans to find the tumor . ", "Treatment": "The best treatment for ectopic Cushing syndrome is surgery to remove the tumor. Surgery is usually possible when the tumor is noncancerous (benign).In some cases, the tumor is cancerous and spreads to other areas of the body before the doctor can discover the problem with cortisol production. Surgery may not be possible in these cases. But the doctor may prescribe medicines to block cortisol production.", "Causes": "Cushing syndrome is a disorder that occurs when your body has a higher than normal level of the hormone cortisol. This hormone is made in the adrenal glands. Too much cortisol can be due to various problems. One such problem is called Cushing disease. It occurs when the pituitary gland makes too much of the hormone ACTH. ACTH then signals the adrenal glands to produce too much cortisol.Ectopic Cushing syndrome, on the other hand, occurs when ACTH is produced somewhere other than the pituitary gland. Ectopic means occurring in an abnormal place.Ectopic Cushing syndrome is caused by tumors that release ACTH. Tumors that can, in rare cases, release ACTH include:Benign carcinoid tumors of the lung, Islet cell tumors of the pancreas, Medullary carcinoma of the thyroid, Small cell tumors of the lung, Tumors of the thymus gland . ", "Prevention": "Prompt treatment of tumors may reduce the risk in some cases. Many cases are not preventable."}, "Esophageal perforation": {"description": "An esophageal perforation is a hole in the esophagus. The esophagus is the tube food passes through as it goes from the mouth to the stomach.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Permanent damage to the esophagus (narrowing or stricture), Abscess formation in and around the esophagus, Infection in and around the lungs . ", "Symptoms": ["Swallowing problems", "Chest pain", "Breathing problems"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look for:Fast breathing, Fever, Low blood pressure, Rapid heart rate, Neck pain or stiffness and air bubbles underneath the skin if the perforation is in the top part of the esophagus.. You may have a chest x-ray to look for:Air in the soft tissues of the chest, , Fluid that has leaked from the esophagus into the space around the lungs, Collapsed lung. X-rays taken after you drink a non-harmful dye can help pinpoint the location of the perforation.. You may also have chest CT scan look for an abscess in the chest or esophageal cancer. ", "Treatment": "You may need surgery. Surgery will depend on the location and size of the perforation. If surgery is needed, it is best done within 24 hours. Treatment may include:Fluids given through a vein (IV), IV antibiotics to prevent or treat infection, Draining of fluid around the lungs with a chest tube, Mediastinoscopy to remove fluid that has collected in the area behind the breastbone and between the lungs (mediastinum). A stent may be placed in the esophagus if only a small amount of fluid has leaked. This may help avoid surgery.A perforation in the uppermost (neck region) part of the esophagus may heal by itself if you do not eat or drink for a period of time. In this case, you will need a stomach feeding tube or another way to get nutrients.Surgery is often needed to repair a perforation in the middle or bottom portions of the esophagus. The leak may be treated by simple repair or by removing the esophagus depending on the extent of the problem.", "Causes": "The contents of the esophagus can pass into the area surrounding area in the chest (mediastinum), when there is a hole in the esophagus. This often results in infection of the mediastinum (mediastinitis).The most common cause of an esophageal perforation is injury during a medical procedure. However, the use of flexible instruments has made this problem rare.The esophagus may also become perforated as the result of:A tumor, Gastric reflux with ulceration, Previous surgery on the esophagus, Swallowing a foreign object or caustic chemicals, such as household cleaners, disk batteries, and battery acid, Trauma or injury to the chest and esophagus, Violent vomiting . Less common causes include injuries to the esophagus area (blunt trauma) and injury to the esophagus during surgery another organ near the esophagus.", "Prevention": "These injuries are hard to prevent."}, "Enlarged prostate": {"description": "An enlarged prostate is often called benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH). It is not cancer, and it does not raise your risk for prostate cancer.", "Possible Complications": "Men who have had BPH for long time with slowly worsening symptom may develop:Sudden inability to urinate, Urinary tract infections, Urinary stones, Damage to the kidneys, Blood in the urine . BPH may come back over time even after having surgery. ", "Symptoms": ["Dribbling at the end of urinating", "Inability to urinate (urinary retention)", "Incomplete emptying of your bladder", "Incontinence", "Needing to urinate two or more times per night", "Pain with urination or bloody urine (these may indicate infection)", "Slowed or delayed start of the urinary stream", "Straining to urinate", "Strong and sudden urge to urinate", "Weak urine stream "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will ask you questions about your medical history and do a digital rectal exam to feel the prostate gland. Other tests you may have include: Urine flow rate, Post-void residual urine test to see how much urine is left in your bladder after urination, Pressure flow studies to measure the pressure in the bladder as you urinate, Urinalysis to check for blood or infection, Urine culture to check for infection, Prostate-specific antigen (PSA) blood test to screen for prostate cancer, Cystoscopy. You may be asked to fill out a form to rate how bad your symptoms are and how much they affect your daily life. Your doctor can use this score to judge if your condition is getting worse over time. ", "Treatment": "The treatment you choose will be based on how bad your symptoms are and how much they bother you. Your doctor will also take into account other medical problems you may have.Treatment options include \"watchful waiting,\" lifestyle changes, medicines, or surgery.If you are over 60, you are more likely to have symptoms. But many men with an enlarged prostate have only minor symptoms. Self-care steps are often enough to make you feel better.If you have BPH, you should have a yearly exam to monitor your symptoms and see if you need changes in treatment. SELF-CAREFor mild symptoms:Urinate when you first get the urge. Also, go to the bathroom when you have the chance, even if you don't feel a need to urinate., Avoid alcohol and caffeine, especially after dinner., Don't drink a lot of fluid all at once. Spread out fluids during the day. Avoid drinking fluids within 2 hours of bedtime., Try NOT to take over-the-counter cold and sinus medicines that contain decongestants or antihistamines. These drugs can increase BPH symptoms., Keep warm and exercise regularly. Cold weather and lack of physical activity may worsen symptoms., Learn and perform Kegel exercises (pelvic strengthening exercises)., Reduce stress. Nervousness and tension can lead to more frequent urination.. MEDICINESAlpha 1-blockers are a class of drugs that are also used to treat high blood pressure. These medicines relax the muscles of the bladder neck and prostate. This allows easier urination. Most people who take alpha 1-blockers notice improvement in their symptoms. .Finasteride and dutasteride lower levels of hormones produced by the prostate. These drugs also reduce the size of the gland, increase urine flow rate, and decrease symptoms of BPH. You may need to take these medicines for 3 to 6 months before you notice symptoms getting better. Possible side effects include decreased sex drive and impotence.Antibiotics may be prescribed to treat chronic prostatitis (inflammation of the prostate), which may occur with BPH. BPH symptoms improve in some men after a course of antibiotics.SAW PALMETTOMany herbs have been tried for treating an enlarged prostate. Many men use saw palmetto to ease symptoms. Some studies have shown that it may help with symptoms, but results are mixed and more research is needed. If you use saw palmetto and think it works, ask your doctor if you should still take it.SURGERYProstate surgery may be recommended if you have:Incontinence, Recurrent blood in the urine, Inability to fully empty the bladder (urinary retention), Recurrent urinary tract infections, Decreasing kidney function, Bladder stones. The choice of a specific surgical procedure is usually based on the severity of your symptoms and the size and shape of your prostate gland.Transurethral resection of the prostate(TURP): This is the most common and most proven surgical treatment for BPH. TURP is performed by inserting a scope through the penis and removing the prostate piece by piece.Simple prostatectomy: An open prostatectomy is usually performed using general or spinal anesthesia. An incision is made through the abdomen or perineum (the area behind the scrotum). Only the inner part of the prostate gland is removed. The outer portion is left behind. This is a long procedure. Most people need to stay in the hospital for 5 to 10 days. This treatment is most often done on men who have very large prostate glands. Most men who have prostate surgery have improvement in urine flow rates and symptoms.Other, less-invasive procedures use heat to destroy prostate tissue. None have been proven to be better than TURP. Patients who receive these procedures are more likely to need surgery again after 5 or 10 years. However, these procedures may be a choice for:Younger men (many of the less-invasive procedures carry a lower risk for impotence and incontinence than TURP, although the risk with TURP is not very high), Elderly patients, Patients with severe medical conditions, including uncontrolled diabetes, cirrhosis, alcoholism, psychosis, and serious lung, kidney, or heart disease, Men who are taking blood-thinning drugs. ", "Causes": "The actual cause of prostate enlargement is unknown. Factors linked to aging and changes in the cells of the testicles may have a role in the growth of the gland. Men who have had their testicles removed at a young age (for example, as a result of testicular cancer) do not develop BPH.Also, if the testicles are removed after a man develops BPH the prostate begins to shrink in size.Some facts about prostate enlargement:The likelihood of developing an enlarged prostate increases with age., BPH is so common that it has been said all men will have an enlarged prostate if they live long enough., A small amount of prostate enlargement is present in many men over age 40. More than 90% of men over age 80 have the condition., No risk factors have been identified other than having normally functioning testicles. . "}, "Eisenmenger syndrome": {"description": "Eisenmenger syndrome is a condition that affects blood flow from the heart to the lungs in some people who were born with structural problems of the heart.", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding (hemorrhage) in the brain, Congestive heart failure, Gout, Heart attack, Hyperviscosity (sludging of the blood because it is too thick with blood cells), Infection (abscess) in the brain, Kidney failure, Poor blood flow to the brain, Stroke, Sudden death. ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish lips, fingers, toes, and skin (cyanosis)", "Chest pain", "Coughing up blood", "Dizziness", "Fainting", "Feeling tired", "Shortness of breath", "Stroke", "Swelling in the joints caused by too much uric acid (gout)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will examine the child. During the exam, the doctor may find:Abnormal heart rhythm (arrhythmia), Enlarged ends of the fingers\u00a0or toes (clubbing), Heart murmur (an extra sound when listening to the heart). The doctor will diagnose Eisenmenger syndrome by looking at the person's history of heart problems. Tests may include:Complete blood count (CBC), Chest x-ray, MRI scan of the heart, Putting a thin tube in an artery to view the heart and blood vessels and measure pressures (cardiac catheterization), Test of the electrical activity in the heart (electrocardiogram), Ultrasound of the heart (echocardiogram). The number of cases of this condition in the United States has dropped because doctors are now able to diagnose and correct the defect sooner, before the irreversible damage occurs to the small lung arteries.", "Treatment": "At times, people with symptoms may have blood removed from the body (phlebotomy) to reduce the number of red blood cells, and then receive fluids to replace the lost blood (volume replacement).Affected people may receive oxygen, although it is unclear\u00a0if it helps to prevent the disease from getting worse. People with very severe symptoms may need a heart-lung transplant.", "Causes": "Eisenmenger syndrome is a condition that results from abnormal blood circulation caused by a defect in the heart. Most often, people with this condition are born with a hole between the two pumping chambers -- the left and right ventricles -- of the heart (ventricular septal defect). The hole allows blood that has already picked up oxygen from the lungs to flow back into the lungs, instead of going out to the rest of the body.Other heart defects that can lead to Eisenmenger syndrome include:Atrioventricular canal defect, Atrial septal defect, Cyanotic heart disease, Patent ductus arteriosus, Truncus arteriosus . Over time, typically over many years, increased blood flow can damage the small blood vessels in the lungs. This causes high blood pressure in the lungs. As a result, the blood backs up and does not go to the lungs to pick up oxygen. Instead, the blood goes from the right side to the left side of the heart, allowing oxygen-poor blood to travel to the rest of the body.Eisenmenger syndrome may begin to develop before a child reaches puberty. However, it also can develop in young adulthood, and may\u00a0progress throughout young adulthood.", "Prevention": "Surgery as early as possible to correct the heart defect can prevent Eisenmenger syndrome."}, "Ear infection - chronic": {"description": "Chronic ear infection is fluid, swelling, or an infection behind the eardrum that does not go away or keeps coming back. It causes long-term or permanent damage to the ear.", "Possible Complications": "A chronic ear infection may cause permanent changes to the ear and nearby bones, including:Infection of the mastoid bone behind the ear (mastoiditis), Ongoing drainage from a hole in the eardrum that does not heal, or after the ear tubes are inserted, Cyst in the middle ear (cholesteatoma), Hardening of the tissue in the middle ear (tympanosclerosis), Damage to, or wearing away of the bones of the middle ear, which help with hearing, Paralysis of the face, Inflammation around the brain (epidural abscess) or in the brain, Damage to the part of the ear that helps with balance. Hearing loss from damage to the middle ear may slow language and speech development. This is more likely if both ears are affected.Permanent hearing loss is rare, but the risk increases with the number and length of infections.", "Symptoms": ["Ear pain or discomfort that is usually mild and feels like pressure in the ear", "Fever, usually low-grade", "Fussiness in infants", "Pus-like drainage from the ear", "Hearing loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will examine the ears. This may reveal:Dullness, redness in the middle ear, Air bubbles in the middle ear, Thick fluid in the middle ear, Eardrum\u00a0that sticks to the bones in the middle ear, Draining fluid from the eardrum, A hole (perforation) in the eardrum, An\u00a0eardrum that bulges out or pulls back inward (collapses) . Tests may include:Cultures of the fluid may show bacteria, and these bacteria may be harder to treat than the bacteria commonly involved in an acute ear infection., A CT scan of the head or mastoids may show that the infection has spread beyond the middle ear., Hearing tests may be needed. . ", "Treatment": "The health care provider may prescribe antibiotics if the infection is caused by bacteria. These medicines may need to be taken for a long time. They can be given by mouth or into a vein (intravenously).If there is a hole in the eardrum, antibiotic ear drops are used. The health care provider may recommend using a mild acidic solution (such as vinegar and water) for a hard-to-treat infected ear that has a hole (perforation). A surgeon may need to clean out (debride) tissue that has gathered inside the ear.Other surgeries that may be needed include:Surgery to clean the infection out of the mastoid bone (mastoidectomy), Surgery to repair or replace the small bones in the middle ear, Repair of the eardrum, Ear tube surgery. ", "Causes": "The Eustachian tube runs from the middle of each ear to the back of the throat. This tube drains fluid made in the middle ear. If the Eustachian tube becomes blocked, fluid can build up. When this happens, infection can occur. A chronic ear infection develops when fluid or an infection behind the eardrum does not go away. A chronic ear infection may be caused by:An acute ear infection that does not completely go away, Repeated ear infections . \"Suppurative chronic otitis\" is a phrase doctors use to describe an eardrum that keeps rupturing, draining, or swelling in the middle ear or mastoid area and does not go away.Ear infections are more common in children because their Eustachian tubes are shorter, narrower, and more horizontal than in adults. Chronic ear infections are much less common than acute ear infections.", "Prevention": "Getting prompt treatment for an acute ear infection may reduce the risk of developing a chronic ear infection. Have a follow-up exam with the health care provider after an ear infection has been treated to make sure that it is completely cured."}, "Electrical injury": {"Symptoms": ["Type and strength of voltage", "How long you were in contact with the electricity", "How the electricity moved through your body", "Your overall health", "Changes in alertness (consciousness)", "Broken bones", "Heart attack (chest, arm, neck, jaw, or back pain)", "Headache", "Problems with swallowing, vision, or hearing", "Irregular heartbeat", "Muscle spasms and pain", "Numbness or tingling", "Breathing problems or lung failure", "Seizures", "Skin burns"], "Causes": "Accidental contact with exposed parts of electrical appliances or wiring, Flashing of electric arcs from high-voltage power lines, Lightning, Machinery or occupational-related exposures, Young children biting or chewing on electrical cords, or poking metal objects into an electrical outlet . ", "description": "An electrical injury is damage to the skin or internal organs when a person comes into direct contact with an electrical current.", "Prevention": "Avoid electrical hazards at home and at work. Always follow manufacturer's safety instructions when using electrical appliances, Avoid using electrical appliances while showering or wet, Keep children away from electrical devices, especially those that are plugged in, Keep electrical cords out of children's reach, Never touch electrical appliances while touching faucets or cold water pipes, Teach children about the dangers of electricity, Use child safety plugs in all outlets. "}, "Estrogen overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breast tenderness", "Drowsiness", "Excessive vaginal bleeding (2 - 7 days following overdose)", "Fluid retention", "Headache", "Emotional changes", "Nausea and vomiting", "Skin rash", "Urine discoloration "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in child-proof containers and out of reach of children. Read all medication labels and take only medications which have been prescribed for you."}, "Esophageal stricture - benign": {"description": "Benign means that it is not caused by cancer of the esophagus. ", "Possible Complications": "Swallowing problems may keep you from getting enough fluids and nutrients. Solid food, especially meat, can get stuck above the stricture. If this happens, endoscopy would be needed to remove the lodged food. There is also a higher risk of having food, fluid, or vomit enter the lungs with regurgitation. This can cause choking or aspiration pneumonia.", "Symptoms": ["Trouble swallowing", "Pain with swallowing", "Unintentional weight loss", "Regurgitation of food "], "Exams and Tests": "You may need the following tests:Barium swallow to look for narrowing of the esophagus, Endoscopy to look for narrowing of the esophagus. ", "Treatment": "Dilation (stretching) of the esophagus is the main treatment for acid reflux related strictures. You may need to have this treatment repeated after a period of time to prevent the stricture from narrowing again.Proton pump inhibitors (acid-blocking medicines) can keep a peptic stricture from returning. Surgery is rarely needed.If you have eosinophilic esophagitis, you may need to take medicines or make changes to your diet to reduce the inflammation. In some cases, dilation is done.", "Causes": "Esophageal stricture can be caused by:Gastroesophageal reflux (GERD), Eosinophilic esophagitis, Injuries caused by an endoscope, Long-term use of a nasogastric (NG) tube (tube through the nose into the stomach), Swallowing substances that harm the lining of the esophagus. These may include household cleaners, lye, disc batteries, or battery acid., Treatment of esophageal varices. ", "Prevention": "Use safety measures to avoid swallowing substances that can harm your esophagus. Keep dangerous chemicals out of the reach of children. See your doctor if you have GERD. "}, "Endophthalmitis": {"Symptoms": ["\r\n  \r\n  Decreased vision\r\n  \r\n  ", "\r\n  Pain\r\n  ", "Redness", "\r\n  Swelling of the eyelids\r\n  "], "description": "Endophthalmitis involves swelling (inflammation) within the eyeball. It is a serious condition.", "Causes": "Endophthalmitis is caused by infection with bacteria or a fungus. It very often occurs as a rare complication of cataract or other eye surgery."}, "Excessive or unwanted hair in women": {"Symptoms": ["Chin and upper lip", "Chest and upper abdomen", "Back and buttocks", "Inner thigh "], "description": "Most of the time, women have fine hair above their lips and on their chins, chests, abdomens, or backs. The growth of coarse dark hair in these areas (more typical of male-pattern hair growth) is called hirsutism.", "Causes": "Women normally produce low levels of male hormones (androgens). If your body makes too much of this hormone, you may have unwanted hair growth.In most cases, the exact cause is never known. The condition often runs in families.A common cause of hirsutism is polycystic ovarian syndrome (PCOS). Women with PCOS and other hormone conditions that cause unwanted hair growth may also have acne, problems with menstrual periods, trouble losing weight, and diabetes. If these symptoms start suddenly, you may have a tumor that releases male hormones.Other, rare causes of unwanted hair growth may include:Tumor or cancer of the adrenal gland, Tumor or cancer of the ovary, Cushing syndrome, Congenital adrenal hyperplasia, Hyperthecosis, a condition in which the ovaries produce too much male hormones. Use of certain medicines may also be the cause of unwanted hair growth, including:Testosterone, Danazol, Anabolic steroids, DHEA, Glucocorticoids, Cyclosporine, Minoxidil, Phenytoin . Rarely, women with hirsutism have normal levels of male hormones, and the specific cause of the unwanted hair growth cannot be identified.", "Treatment": "Hirsutism is generally a long-term problem. There are many ways to remove or treat unwanted hair. Some treatment effects last longer than others.Medicines. Drugs such as birth control pills and anti-androgen medicines are an option for some women., Electrolysis. Electrical current is used to permanently damage individual hair follicles so they do not grow back. This method is expensive, and multiple treatments are needed. Swelling, scarring, and redness of the skin may occur., Laser energy directed at the dark color (melanin) in the hairs. This method is best for a large area of very dark hair. It does not work on blond or red hair. . Temporary options include:Shaving. Although this does not cause more hair to grow, it may make hair look thicker., Chemicals, plucking, and waxing. These options are safe and inexpensive. However, chemical products may irritate the skin. . For women who are overweight, weight loss may be able to help reduce hair growth."}, "Ehlers-Danlos syndrome": {"description": "Ehlers-Danlos syndrome (EDS) is a group of inherited disorders marked by extremely loose joints, hyperelastic (very stretchy) skin that bruises easily, and easily damaged blood vessels.", "Possible Complications": "Possible complications of Ehlers-Danlos syndrome include:Chronic joint pain, Early-onset arthritis, Failure of surgical wounds to close (or stitches tear out), Premature rupture of membranes during pregnancy, Rupture of major vessels, including a ruptured aortic aneurysm (only in vascular EDS), Rupture of a hollow organ such as the uterus or bowel (only in vascular EDS), Rupture of the eyeball. ", "Symptoms": ["Back pain", "Double-jointedness", "Easily damaged, bruised, and stretchy skin", "Easy scarring and poor wound healing", "Flat feet", "Increased joint mobility, joints popping, early arthritis", "Joint dislocation", "Joint pain", "Premature rupture of membranes during pregnancy", "Very soft and velvety skin", "Vision problems "], "Exams and Tests": "Examination by a health care provider may show:Deformed surface of the eye (cornea), Excess joint looseness and joint hypermobility, Mitral valve in the heart does not close tightly (mitral valve prolapse), Gum infection (periodontitis), Rupture of intestines, uterus, or eyeball (seen only in vascular EDS, which is rare), Soft, thin, or very stretchy skin . Tests to diagnose EDS include:Collagen typing (performed on a skin biopsy sample), Collagen gene mutation testing, Echocardiogram (heart ultrasound), Lysyl hydroxylase or oxidase activity (to check collagen formation) . ", "Treatment": "There is no specific cure for Ehlers-Danlos syndrome. Individual problems and symptoms are evaluated and cared for appropriately. Physical therapy or evaluation by a doctor specializing in rehabilitation medicine is often needed.", "Causes": "There are 6 major types and at least 5 minor types of Ehlers-Danlos syndrome.A variety of gene changes (mutations) cause problems with collagen. This is the material that provides strength and structure to: Skin, Bone, Blood vessels, Internal organs . The abnormal collagen leads to the symptoms associated with EDS. In some forms of the syndrome, the rupture of internal organs or abnormal heart valves can occur.Family history is a risk factor in some cases.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for prospective parents with a family history of Ehlers-Danlos syndrome. Those planning to start a family should be aware of the type of EDS they have and its mode of\u00a0how it is passed down to children. This can be determined through testing and evaluations suggested by your health care provider or genetic counselor.Identifying any significant health risks may help prevent severe complications by vigilant screening and lifestyle alterations."}, "Eyelid twitch": {"Symptoms": ["Repeated uncontrollable twitching or spasms of your eyelid (most often the upper lid)", "Light sensitivity (sometimes, this is the cause of the twitching)", "Blurry vision (sometimes) "], "Possible Complications": "Permanent eye injury from unrecognized cornea injury is possible, but rare.", "description": "An eyelid twitch is a general term for spasms of the eyelid muscles that happen without your control. The eyelid may repeatedly close (or nearly close) and reopen. This article discusses eyelid twitches in general. ", "Causes": "The most common things that make the muscle in your eyelid twitch are fatigue, stress, and caffeine. Once spasms begin, they may continue off and on for a few days. Then, they disappear. Most people have this type of eyelid twitch once in a while and find it very annoying. In most cases, you won't even notice when the twitch has stopped.More severe contractions, where the eyelid completely closes, are possible. These can be caused by irritation of the surface of the eye (cornea) or the membranes lining the eyelids (conjunctiva).Sometimes, the reason your eyelid is twitching cannot be found. This form of eyelid twitching lasts much longer and is often very uncomfortable. It can also cause your eyelids to close completely.", "Treatment": "Eyelid twitching most often goes away without treatment. In the meantime, the following steps may help:Get more sleep., Drink less caffeine., Lubricate your eyes with eye drops. . If twitching is severe or lasts a long time, small injections of botulinum toxin can control the spasms."}, "Endometrial cancer": {"description": "Endometrial cancer is cancer that starts in the endometrium, the lining of the uterus (womb).", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include any of the following:Anemia due to blood loss (before diagnosis), Perforation (hole) of the uterus, which may occur during a D and C or endometrial biopsy, Problems from surgery, radiation, and chemotherapy. ", "Symptoms": ["\r\n  Abnormal bleeding from the vagina, including bleeding between periods or spotting/bleeding after menopause ", "Extremely long, heavy, or frequent episodes of vaginal bleeding after age 40", "Lower abdominal pain or pelvic cramping", "Thin white or clear vaginal discharge after menopause"], "Exams and Tests": "During the early stages of disease, a pelvic exam is often normal. As the cancer becomes more advanced, there may be changes in the size, shape, or feel of the uterus or surrounding structures.Tests that may be done include:Endometrial biopsy, Dilation and curettage (D and C), Pap smear (may raise a suspicion for endometrial cancer, but does not diagnose it), If cancer is found, imaging tests may be done to see if the cancer has spread to other parts of the body. This is called staging.. Stages of endometrial cancer are:Stage 1: The cancer is only in the uterus., Stage 2: The cancer is in the uterus and cervix., Stage 3: The cancer has spread outside of the uterus, but not beyond the true pelvis area. Cancer may involve the lymph nodes in the pelvis or near the aorta (the major artery in the abdomen)., Stage 4: The cancer has spread to the inner surface of the bowel, bladder, abdomen, or other organs.. Cancer is also described as grade 1, 2, or 3. Grade 1 is the least aggressive, and grade 3 is the most aggressive. Aggressive means that the cancer grows and spreads quickly.", "Treatment": "Treatment options include surgery, radiation therapy, and chemotherapy.Surgery to remove the uterus (hysterectomy) may be done in women with early stage 1 cancer. The doctor may also recommend removing the tubes and ovaries.Surgery combined with radiation therapy is another treatment option. It is often used for women with Stage 1 disease that has a high chance of returning, has spread to the lymph nodes, or is a grade 2 or 3. , Stage 2 disease.. Chemotherapy or hormonal therapy may be considered in some cases, most often for those with stage 3 and 4 disease.", "Causes": "Endometrial cancer is the most common type of uterine cancer. The exact cause of endometrial cancer is unknown. An increased level of estrogen may play a role. Estrogen helps stimulate the buildup of the lining of the uterus. This can lead to overgrowth of the endometrium and cancer.Most cases of endometrial cancer occur between the ages of 60 and 70. A few cases may occur before age 40.The following factors related to your hormones increase your risk of endometrial cancer:Estrogen replacement therapy without the use of progesterone, History of endometrial polyps, Infrequent periods, Never being pregnant, Obesity, Polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS), Starting menstruation at an early age (before age 12), Starting menopause after age 50 , Tamoxifen, a drug used for breast cancer treatment . Women with the following conditions also seem to be at a higher risk of endometrial cancer:Colon or breast cancer, Diabetes, Gallbladder disease, High blood pressure. ", "Prevention": "There is no effective screening test for endometrial (uterine) cancer. Women with risk factors for endometrial cancer should be followed closely by their doctors. This includes women who are taking estrogen replacement therapy without progesterone therapy or women who have taken tamoxifen for more than 2 years. Frequent pelvic exams, Pap smears and endometrial biopsy may be considered in some cases. The risk of endometrial cancer is reduced by:Maintaining a normal weight , Using birth control pills for over a year . "}, "Ear wax": {"Symptoms": ["Earache", "Fullness in the ear or a sensation that the ear is plugged", "Noises in the ear (tinnitus)", "Partial hearing loss, may get worse"], "description": "Wax can build up and block the ear canal. Wax blockage is one of the most common causes of hearing loss.", "Causes": "Ear wax protects the ear by:Trapping and preventing dust, bacteria, and other germs and small\u00a0objects from entering and damaging the ear , Protecting the delicate skin of the ear canal from getting irritated when water is in the canal. In some people, the glands produce more wax than can be easily removed from the ear. This extra wax may harden in the ear canal and block the ear. When you try to clean the ear, you may instead push wax deeper\u00a0and block\u00a0the ear canal.", "Treatment": "Most cases of ear wax blockage can be treated at home. The following remedies can be used to soften wax in the ear:\r\n Baby oil\r\n , \r\n Commercial drops\r\n , \r\n Glycerin\r\n , \r\n Mineral oil\r\n , \r\n Water\r\n . Another method is to wash out the wax. Use body-temperature water (cooler or warmer water may cause brief but severe dizziness or vertigo)., Hold your head upright and\u00a0straighten the ear canal by holding the outside ear and gently pulling upward., Use a syringe (you can buy one at the store) to gently direct a small stream of water against the ear canal wall next to the wax plug., Tip your head to allow the water to drain. You may need to repeat irrigation several times. . To avoid damaging your ear or causing an infection:Never irrigate the ear if the eardrum may have a hole in it., Do not irrigate the ear with a jet irrigator designed for cleaning teeth (such as a WaterPik). . After the wax is removed, dry the ear thoroughly. You may use a few drops of alcohol in the ear or a hair dryer set on low to help dry the ear.You may clean the outer ear canal by using a cloth or paper tissue wrapped around your finger. Mineral oil can be used to moisturize the ear and prevent the wax from drying.Do not clean your ears too often or too hard. Ear wax also helps protect your ears., Never try to clean the ear by putting any object, such as a cotton swab, into the ear canal. . If you cannot remove the wax plug or you have discomfort, consult a health care provider, who may remove the wax by:Repeating the irrigation attempts, \r\n Suctioning the ear canal\r\n , \r\n Using a small device called a curette\r\n , \r\n Using a microscope to help\r\n . "}, "Echinococcus": {"description": "Echinococcus is an infection caused by the Echinococcus granulosus or Echinococcus multilocularis tapeworm. The infection is also called hydatid disease.", "Possible Complications": "The cysts may break open (rupture) and cause severe illness, including:Fever, Low blood pressure, Shock. The cysts may also spread throughout the body.", "Symptoms": ["Pain in the upper right part of the abdomen", "Bloody sputum", "Chest pain", "Cough", "Fever", "Severe skin itching"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may show signs of:Abdominal pain, Problems with the skin and other organs, Shock. The following tests may be done to find the cysts:Abdominal CT scan or ultrasound, Abdominal X-ray, Blood test, Chest x-ray, Liver function tests, Thoracic CT scan or ultrasound. Most often, echinococcosis is found when an imaging test is done for another reason.", "Treatment": "Many patients can be treated with anti-worm medicines.The cysts may be removed with surgery, if possible. But this can be a complicated surgery.", "Causes": "Echinococcus is common in:Africa, Central Asia, Southern South America, The Mediterranean, The Middle East. In the United States, the disease is very rare.\u00a0But it has been reported in California, Arizona, New Mexico, and Utah.Humans become infected when they swallow eggs in contaminated food. The infection is carried to the liver, where cysts form. Cysts can also form in the:Brain, Bones, Kidney, Lungs, Skeletal muscles, Spleen. Risk factors include being exposed to:Cattle, Deer, Feces of dogs, wolves, or coyotes, Pigs, Sheep. ", "Prevention": "In areas where the disease is known to occur, health education and routinely removing tapeworms from dogs can help prevent the disease."}, "Eyelid bump": {"description": "Most bumps on the eyelid are styes. A stye is an inflamed oil gland on the edge of your eyelid, where the lash meets the lid. It appears as a red, swollen bump that looks like a pimple. It is often tender to the touch.", "Symptoms": ["A gritty, scratchy sensation as if there is\u00a0a foreign body\u00a0in\u00a0your eye\r\n ", "Sensitivity to light\r\n ", "Tearing of your eye", "Tenderness of the eyelid"], "Exams and Tests": "In most cases, your health care provider can diagnose a stye just by looking at it. Tests are rarely needed.", "Causes": "A stye is caused by a blockage of one of the oil glands in the eyelids. This allows bacteria to grow\u00a0inside the blocked gland. Styes are a lot like common acne pimples that occur elsewhere on the skin. You may have more than one stye at the same time.Styes most often develop over a few days. They may drain and heal on their own. A stye can become a chalazion, which occurs when an inflamed oil gland becomes fully blocked. If a chalazion gets large enough, it can cause trouble with your vision.If you have blepharitis (see eye redness), you are more likely to get styes.Other possible common eyelid bumps include:Xanthelasma: Raised yellow patches on your eyelids that can happen with age. These are harmless, although they are sometimes a sign of high cholesterol., Papillomas: Pink or skin-colored bumps. They are harmless, but can slowly grow, affect your vision, or bother you for cosmetic reasons. If so, they can be surgically removed., Cysts: Small fluid-filled sacs that can affect your vision. . ", "Prevention": "Always wash your hands very well before touching the skin around your eye. If you are prone to getting styes or have blepharitis, it may help to carefully clean off excess oils from the edges of your lids. To do this, use,a solution of warm water and no-tears baby shampoo.", "Treatment": "To treat eyelid bumps at home:Apply a warm, wet cloth to the area for 10 minutes. Do this four times a day., Do NOT attempt to squeeze a stye or any other type of eyelid bump. Let it drain on its own., Do NOT use contact lenses or wear eye makeup until the area has healed. . For a stye, your doctor may:Prescribe antibiotic ointment, Make an opening in the stye to drain it (Do NOT try this at home). "}, "Ebola virus disease": {"Symptoms": ["Fever greater than 101.5\u00b0F (38.6\u00b0C)", "Chills", "Severe headache", "Sore throat", "Muscle pain", "Weakness", "Fatigue", "Rash\u00a0", "Abdominal (stomach) pain ", "Diarrhea", "Vomiting", "Bleeding from the mouth and rectum", "Bleeding from eyes, ears, and nose", "Organ failure"], "Causes": "WHERE EBOLA OCCURSEbola was discovered in 1976 near the Ebola River in the Democratic Republic of the Congo. Since then, several small outbreaks have occurred in Africa. The 2014 outbreak is the largest. Countries affected in this recent outbreak include:Guinea, Liberia, Sierra Leone . Ebola\u00a0was previously\u00a0reported in:Nigeria, Senegal, Spain, United States, Mali, United Kingdom\u00a0. There are no current cases of Ebola in these countries. Most of these cases\u00a0were due to people traveling from a country where Ebola\u00a0was present.There were\u00a04 people diagnosed with Ebola in the United States. Two were imported cases, and two contracted the disease after caring for an Ebola patient in the United States.\u00a0One man died from the disease. The other three recovered and are now free of Ebola. HOW EBOLA CAN SPREADEbola does not spread as easily as more common illnesses such as colds, the flu, or measles. There is NO evidence that the virus that causes Ebola is spread through the air or water. A person who has Ebola CANNOT spread the disease until symptoms appear.Ebola can ONLY spread between humans by direct contact with infected body fluids including but not limited to urine, saliva, sweat, feces, vomit, breast milk, and semen. The virus can enter the body through a break in the skin or through mucous membranes, including the eyes, nose, and mouth.Ebola can also spread by contact with ANY surfaces, objects, and materials that have been in contact with body fluids from a sick person, such as:Bedclothes and bedding, Clothing, Bandages, Needles and syringes, Medical equipment . In Africa, Ebola may also be spread by:Handling infected wild animals hunted for food (bushmeat), Contact with blood or body fluids of infected animals, Contact with infected bats . Ebola does NOT spread through:Air, Water, Food, Insects (mosquitoes) . Health care workers and people caring for sick relatives are most at risk for developing Ebola because they are more likely to come in to direct contact with body fluids.", "description": "For the most up-to-date information, please visit the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's (CDC) website: http://www.cdc.gov/vhf/ebola/index.html.", "Prevention": "\r\nThere is no vaccine to protect against Ebola. The CDC urges all United States residents to avoid travel to Liberia, Guinea, and Sierra Leone because of unprecedented outbreaks of Ebola in those countries.If you plan to travel to one of the countries where Ebola is present, the CDC recommends taking the following steps to prevent illness:Practice careful hygiene. Wash your hands with soap and water or an alcohol-based hand sanitizer. Avoid contact with blood and body fluids., Avoid contact with people who have a fever, are vomiting, or appear ill., Do not handle items that may have come in contact with an infected person's blood or body fluids. This includes clothes, bedding, needles, and medical equipment., Avoid funeral or burial rituals that require handling the body of someone who has died from Ebola., Avoid contact with bats and nonhuman primates or blood, fluids, and raw meat prepared from these animals., Avoid hospitals in West Africa where Ebola patients are being treated. If you need medical care, the United States embassy or consulate is often able to provide advice\u00a0about facilities., After you return, pay attention to your health for 21 days. Seek medical care right away if you develop symptoms of Ebola, such as a fever. Tell the health care providers that you have been to a country where Ebola is present.. Health care workers who may be exposed to people with Ebola should follow these steps:Wear protective clothing, including masks, gloves, gowns, and eye protection., Practice proper infection control and sterilization measures. , Isolate patients with Ebola from other patients., Avoid direct contact with the bodies of people who have died from Ebola., Notify health officials if you have had direct contact with the blood or body fluids of a person who is sick with Ebola.. ", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for Ebola. Experimental treatments have been used, but none have been fully tested to see if they work well and are safe.People with Ebola must be treated in a hospital. There, they can be isolated so the disease cannot\u00a0spread. Health care providers will treat the symptoms of the disease.Treatment for Ebola includes:Fluids given through a vein (IV), Oxygen, Blood pressure management, Treatment for other infections, Blood transfusions. Survival depends on how a person's immune system responds to the virus. A person also may be more likely to survive if they receive good medical care.People who survive Ebola are immune from the virus for 10 years or more. They can no longer spread Ebola. However, men who survive can carry the Ebola virus in their sperm for as long as 3 months. They should abstain from sex or use condoms for 3 months.Long-term complications can include joint and vision problems."}, "End-stage kidney disease": {"description": "End-stage kidney disease is the last stage of chronic kidney disease. This is when your kidneys can no longer support your body\u2019s needs. The kidneys remove waste and excess water from the body.", "Possible Complications": "Anemia, Bleeding from the stomach or intestines, Bone, joint, and muscle pain, Changes in blood sugar (glucose), Damage to nerves of the legs and arms, Fluid buildup around the lungs, High blood pressure,\u00a0heart attack,\u00a0and heart failure, High potassium levels, Increased risk of infection\r\n , Liver damage or failure, Malnutrition\u00a0\u00a0, Miscarriages or infertility\u00a0, Restless legs syndrome, Stroke, seizures, and dementia, Swelling and edema , Weakening of the bones and fractures related to high phosphorous and low calcium levels. ", "Symptoms": ["General ill feeling and fatigue", "Itching (pruritus) and dry skin", "Headaches", "Weight loss without trying", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Abnormally dark or light skin", "Nail changes", "Bone pain", "Drowsiness and confusion", "Problems concentrating or thinking", "Numbness in the hands, feet, or other areas", "Muscle twitching or cramps", "Breath odor", "Easy bruising, nosebleeds, or blood in the stool", "Excessive thirst", "Frequent hiccups", "Problems with sexual function\r\n ", "Menstrual periods stop (amenorrhea)", "Sleep problems\r\n ", "Swelling of the feet and hands (edema)", "Vomiting,\u00a0often in the morning"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam and order blood tests. Most people with this condition have high blood pressure.Patients with end-stage kidney disease will make much less urine, or urine production may stop.End-stage kidney disease changes the results of many tests. Patients receiving dialysis will need these and other tests done often:Potassium, Sodium, Albumin, Phosphorous, Calcium, Cholesterol, Magnesium, Complete blood count (CBC), Electrolytes. This disease may also change the results of the following tests:Erythropoietin, PTH, Bone density test. ", "Treatment": "Dialysis does some of the job of the kidneys when they stop working well.Dialysis can:Remove extra salt, water, and waste products so they don't build up in your body, Keep safe levels of minerals and vitamins in your body, Help control blood pressure, Help produce red blood cells . Your health care provider will discuss dialysis with you before you need it. Dialysis removes waste from your blood when your kidneys can no longer do their job.Usually, you will go on dialysis when you have only 10 - 15% of your kidney function left., Even people who are waiting for a kidney transplant may need dialysis while waiting. . Two different methods are used to perform dialysis:During hemodialysis, your blood passes through a tube into an artificial kidney, or filter., During peritoneal dialysis, a special solution passes into your belly though a catheter tube. The solution remains in your abdomen for period of time and then is removed. This method can be done at home, at work, or while traveling. . A kidney transplant is surgery to place a healthy kidney into a person with kidney failure. Your doctor will refer you to a transplant center. There, you will be seen and evaluated by the transplant team. They will want to make sure that you are a good candidate for kidney transplant.You may need to follow a special diet for chronic kidney disease. These changes may include:Eat a low-protein diet., Get enough calories if you are losing weight., Limit fluids., Limit salt, potassium, phosphorous, and other electrolytes. . Other treatment depends on your symptoms but may include:Extra calcium and vitamin D (always talk to your doctor before taking supplements), Medicines called phosphate binders, to help prevent phosphorous levels from becoming too high, Treatment for anemia, such as extra iron in the diet, iron pills or shots, shots of a medicine called erythropoietin, and blood transfusions., Medicines to control your blood pressure . You should be up-to-date on important vaccinations, including:Hepatitis A vaccine, Hepatitis B vaccine, Flu vaccine , Pneumonia vaccine (PPV). ", "Causes": "End-stage kidney disease (ESRD) is when the kidneys are no longer able to work at a level needed for day-to-day life.The most common causes of ESRD in the U.S. are diabetes and high blood pressure. These conditions can affect your kidneys.ESRD almost always comes after chronic kidney disease. The kidneys may slowly stop working over 10 - 20 years before end-stage disease results."}, "Eucalyptus oil overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing - rapid", "Breathing - shallow", "Wheezing", "Difficulty swallowing", "Burning sensation in mouth", "Pinpoint pupils ", "Rapid, weak heartbeat", "Low blood pressure ", "Muscle weakness", "Drowsiness", "Headache", "Unconsciousness", "Dizziness", "Seizures", "Slurred speech ", "Redness and swelling (from touching the skin)", "Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Epilepsy - overview": {"description": "Epilepsy is a brain disorder in which a person has repeated seizures over time. Seizures are episodes of disturbed brain activity that cause changes in attention or behavior.", "Possible Complications": "Difficulty learning, Breathing in food or saliva into the lungs during a seizure, which can cause aspiration pneumonia, Injury from falls, bumps, self-inflicted bites, driving or operating machinery during a seizure, Permanent brain damage (stroke or other damage), Side effects of medications. ", "Symptoms": ["Absence (petit mal) seizure (staring spells)", "Generalized tonic-clonic (grand mal) seizure (involves the entire body, including aura, rigid muscles, and loss of alertness)", "Partial (focal) seizure (can involve any of the symptoms described above, depending on where in the brain the seizure starts)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. This will include a detailed look at the brain and nervous system.An EEG (electroencephalogram) will be done to check the electrical activity in the brain. People with epilepsy often have abnormal electrical activity seen on this test. In some cases, the test shows the area in the brain where the seizures start. The brain may appear normal after a seizure or between seizures.To diagnose epilepsy or plan for epilepsy surgery, you may need to:Wear an EEG recorder for days or weeks as you go about your everyday life., Stay in a special hospital where brain activity can be watched on video cameras. This is called video EEG.. Tests that may be done include:Blood chemistry, Blood sugar, CBC (complete blood count), Kidney function tests, Liver function tests, Lumbar puncture (spinal tap), Tests for infectious diseases . Head CT or MRI scan often done to find the cause and location of the problem in the brain.", "Treatment": "Treatment for epilepsy includes medications, lifestyle changes, and sometimes surgery.If epilepsy is due to a tumor, abnormal blood vessels, or bleeding in the brain, surgery to treat these disorders may make the seizures stop.Medication to prevent seizures, called anticonvulsants, may reduce the number of future seizures:These drugs are taken by mouth. Which type you are prescribed depends on the type of seizures you have., Your dosage may need to be changed from time to time. You may need regular blood tests to check for side effects., Always take your medication on time and as directed. Missing a dose can cause you to have a seizure. Do not stop taking or change medications on your own. Talk to your doctor first., Many epilepsy medications cause birth defects. Women who plan to become pregnant should tell their doctor in advance in order to adjust medications. . Many epilepsy medicines may affect the health of your bones. Talk to your doctor about whether you need vitamins and other supplements.Epilepsy that does not get better after two or three anti-seizure drugs have been tried is called \"medically refractory epilepsy.\" In this case, the doctor may recommend surgery to:Remove the abnormal brain cells causing the seizures., Place a vagus nerve stimulator (VNS). This device is similar to a heart pacemaker. It can help reduce the number of seizures. . Some children are placed on a special diet to help prevent seizures. The most popular one is the ketogenic diet. A diet low in carbohydrates, such as the Atkins diet, may also be helpful in some adults. Be sure to discuss these options with your doctor before trying them.Lifestyle or medical changes can increase the risk of a seizure in adults and children with epilepsy. Talk with your doctor about:New prescribed medications, vitamins, or supplements, Emotional stress, Illness, especially infection, Lack of sleep, Pregnancy, Skipping doses of epilepsy medications, Use of alcohol or other recreational drugs . Other considerations:Persons with epilepsy should wear medical alert jewelry so that prompt medical treatment can be obtained if a seizure occurs., Persons with poorly controlled epilepsy should not drive. Check your state's law about which people with a history of seizures are allowed to drive., Do not use machinery or do activities that can cause loss of awareness, such as climbing to high places, biking, and swimming alone. . ", "Causes": "Epilepsy occurs when permanent changes in the brain cause it to be too excitable or irritable. As a result, the brain sends out abnormal signals. This leads to repeated, unpredictable seizures. (A single seizure that does not happen again is not epilepsy.)Epilepsy may be due to a medical condition or injury that affects the brain. Or the cause may be unknown (idiopathic).Common causes of epilepsy include:Stroke or transient ischemic attack (TIA), Dementia, such as Alzheimer disease, Traumatic brain injury, Infections, including brain abscess, meningitis, encephalitis, and HIV/AIDS, Brain problems that are present at birth (congenital brain defect), Brain injury that occurs during or near birth, Metabolism disorders present at birth (such as phenylketonuria), Brain tumor, Abnormal blood vessels in the brain, Other illness that damages or destroys brain tissue. Epileptic seizures usually begin between ages 5 and 20. But they can happen at any age. There may be a family history of seizures or epilepsy.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent epilepsy. Proper diet and sleep, and staying away from illegal drugs and alcohol may decrease the likelihood of triggering seizures in people with epilepsy.Reduce the risk of head injury by wearing helmets during risky activities. This can lessen the likelihood of a brain injury that leads to seizures and epilepsy."}, "Erysipelas": {"description": "Erysipelas is a type of skin infection (cellulitis).", "Possible Complications": "The bacteria may travel to the blood in some cases. This results in a condition called bacteremia. The infection may spread to the heart valves, joints, and bones.Other complications include:Return of infection, Septic shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Blisters", "Fever, shaking, and chills", "Painful, very red, swollen, and warm skin underneath the sore (lesion)", "Skin lesion with a raised border", "Sores (erysipelas lesions) on the cheeks and bridge of the nose"], "Exams and Tests": "Erysipelas is diagnosed based on how the skin looks. A biopsy of the skin is usually not needed.", "Treatment": "Antibiotics such as penicillin are used to\u00a0get rid of the infection. In severe cases, antibiotics may need to be given through an IV (intravenous line).People who have repeated episodes of erysipelas may need long-term antibiotics.", "Causes": "Erysipelas is usually caused by group A Streptococcus bacteria. The condition may affect both children and adults.Risk factors include:A cut in the skin, Problems with drainage through the veins or lymph system, Skin sores (ulcers). The infection occurs on the legs most of the time. It may also occur on the face. ", "Prevention": "Keep your skin healthy by avoiding dry skin and preventing cuts and scrapes. This may reduce the risk for erysipelas."}, "Epidermolysis bullosa": {"description": "Epidermolysis bullosa is a group of disorders in which skin blisters\u00a0form after a\u00a0minor injury. It is passed down in families.", "Possible Complications": "These complications may occur:Anemia, Reduced life span for severe forms of the condition, Esophageal\u00a0narrowing, Eye problems, including blindness, Infection, including sepsis\u00a0(infection in the blood or tissues), Loss of function in the hands and feet, Muscular dystrophy, Periodontal disease, Severe malnutrition caused by feeding difficulty, leading to failure to thrive, Squamous cell skin cancer. ", "Symptoms": ["Alopecia (hair loss)", "Blisters around the eyes and nose", "Blisters in or around the mouth and throat, causing feeding problems or swallowing difficulty", "Blisters on the skin as a result of minor injury or temperature change", "Blistering that is present at birth", "Dental problems such as tooth decay", "Hoarse cry, cough, or other breathing problems", "Tiny white bumps or pimples", "Nail loss or deformed nails "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look at your skin to diagnose epidermolysis bullosa.Tests that are used to confirm the diagnosis include:Genetic testing, Skin biopsy, Special\u00a0tests of skin samples under a microscope. Skin tests are used to tell if a child has epidermolysis bullosa acquisita\u00a0or another form of epidermolysis bullosa.Other tests that may be done include:Blood test for anemia, Culture to check for bacterial infection if wounds are healing poorly, Upper endoscopy or an upper GI series if symptoms include\u00a0swallowing problems. Growth rate will be checked often for a baby who has or may have\u00a0epidermolysis bullosa.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to prevent blisters from forming and avoiding complications. Other treatment will depend on how bad the condition is.HOME CAREFollow these guidelines at home:Take good care of your skin to prevent infections., Follow your health care provider's advice if blistered areas become crusted or raw. You might need regular whirlpool therapy and to apply antibiotic ointments to wound-like areas. Your provider will let you know if you need a bandage or dressing, and if so, what type to use., You may need to use oral steroid medicines for short periods of time if you have swallowing problems. You may also need to take medicine if you get a\u00a0candida (yeast) infection\u00a0in the mouth or throat.\u00a0, Take good care of your oral health and get regular dental check-ups.\u00a0It is best to see a dentist who has experience treating people with epidermolysis bullosa., Eat a healthy diet.\u00a0When you have a lot of skin injury, you may need extra calories and protein to help your skin heal. Choose soft foods and avoid nuts, chips, and other crunchy foods if you have sores in your mouth. A nutritionist can help you with your diet., Do exercises a physical therapist shows you to help keep your joints and muscles mobile. . SURGERYSurgery to treat this condition may include:Skin grafting in\u00a0places where sores are deep\u00a0, Dilation (widening) of the esophagus if there is a narrowing, Repair of hand deformities, Removal of any squamous cell carcinoma (a type of skin cancer)\u00a0that develops. OTHER TREATMENTSOther treatments for this condition may include:Medicines\u00a0that suppress the immune system may be used\u00a0for the autoimmune form of this condition., Protein and gene therapy and the use of the drug interferon are being studied.\u00a0 . ", "Causes": "There are\u00a04 main types of epidermolysis bullosa. They are:Dystrophic epidermolysis bullosa, Epidermolysis bullosa simplex, Hemidesmosomal epidermolysis bullosa, Junctional epidermolysis bullosa. Another rare type of epidermolysis bullosa is called epidermolysis bullosa acquisita. It\u00a0is an autoimmune disorder, which means the body attacks itself.Epidermolysis bullosa can vary from minor blistering of the skin to a life-threatening form that affects\u00a0other organs.\u00a0 Most types of this condition\u00a0start at birth or soon after. It can be hard to identify\u00a0the exact type of epidermolysis bullosa a person has. Having a family history of the disease, and especially having a parent with it, is a risk factor.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for prospective parents who have a family history of any form of epidermolysis bullosa.During pregnancy, chorionic villus sampling to test the fetus is available. For couples at high risk of having a child with epidermolysis bullosa, the test can be done as early as week 8\u00a0to 10 of pregnancy. Talk to your obstetrician and genetic counselor.To prevent skin damage and blistering, it may help to wear padding around injury-prone areas such as the elbows, knees, ankles, and buttocks. Contact sports should be avoided.Patients with epidermolysis bullosa acquisita who are on steroids for longer than 1 month may need calcium and vitamin D supplements to prevent osteoporosis\u00a0(thinning bones)."}, "Eclampsia": {"description": "Eclampsia is seizures (convulsions) in a pregnant woman. These seizures are not related to an existing brain condition.", "Possible Complications": "Women with eclampsia or preeclampsia have a higher risk of: Separation of the placenta (placenta abruptio), Premature delivery that leads to complications in the baby, Blood clotting problems . ", "Symptoms": ["Muscle aches and pains", "Seizures", "Severe agitation", "Unconsciousness ", "Gaining more than 2 pounds a week", "Headaches", "Nausea and vomiting", "Stomach pain", "Swelling of the hands and face", "Vision problems"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a physical exam to look for causes of seizures. Blood pressure and breathing rate will be checked regularly.Blood and urine tests may be done to check:Blood clotting factors, Creatinine, Hematocrit, Uric acid, Liver function, Platelet count, Protein in the urine . ", "Treatment": "The main treatment to prevent severe preeclampsia from progressing to eclampsia is giving birth to the baby. Letting the pregnancy go on can be dangerous for you and the baby.You may be given medicine to prevent seizures. These medicines are called anticonvulsants. Your doctor may prescribe medicine to lower high blood pressure. If your blood pressure stays high, delivery may be needed, even if it is before the baby is due.", "Causes": "Doctors do not know exactly what causes eclampsia. Factors that may play a role include:Blood vessel problems, Brain and nervous system (neurological) factors, Diet, Genes . Eclampsia follows a condition called preeclampsia. This is a serious complication of pregnancy in which a woman has high blood pressure and very rapid weight gain. Most women with preeclampsia do not go on to have seizures. It is hard to predict which women will. Women at high risk of seizures have severe preeclampsia with findings such as:Abnormal blood tests, Headaches, Very high blood pressure, Vision changes . Your chance of getting preeclampsia increases when:You are 35 or older, You are African American, This is your first pregnancy, You have diabetes, high blood pressure, or kidney disease, You are having more than one baby (such as twins or triplets), You are a teen . ", "Prevention": "Getting medical care all during pregnancy is important in preventing complications. This allows problems such as preeclampsia to be detected and treated early. Getting treatment for preeclampsia may prevent eclampsia."}, "Ectopic pregnancy": {"description": "An ectopic pregnancy is a pregnancy that occurs outside the womb (uterus).\u00a0It is life-threatening to the mother.", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal vaginal bleeding", "Low back pain", "Mild cramping on one side of the pelvis", "No periods", "Pain in the lower belly or pelvic area ", "Fainting or feeling faint", "Intense pressure in the rectum", "Low blood pressure", "Pain in the shoulder area", "Severe, sharp, and sudden pain in the lower abdomen "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a pelvic exam. The exam may show tenderness in the pelvic area.A pregnancy test and vaginal ultrasound will be done. HCG is a hormone normally produced during pregnancy. Checking the blood level of this hormone (quantitative HCG blood test) can diagnose pregnancy. If the blood level of HCG is not rising fast enough, your doctor may suspect an ectopic pregnancy.", "Causes": "In most pregnancies, the fertilized egg travels through the fallopian tube to the womb (uterus). If the movement of the egg is blocked or slowed through the tubes, it can lead to an ectopic pregnancy. Things that may cause this problem include:Birth defect in the fallopian tubes, Scarring after a ruptured appendix, Endometriosis, Having had a previous ectopic pregnancy, Scarring from past infections or surgery of the female organs . The following also increase risk of an ectopic pregnancy:Age over 35, Getting pregnant while having an intrauterine device (IUD), Having your tubes tied (tubal ligation): This is more likely 2 or more years after the procedure, Having had surgery to untie tubes (tubal sterilization) to become pregnant, Having had many sexual partners, Some infertility treatments . Sometimes the cause is unknown. Hormones may play a role.The most common site for an ectopic pregnancy is within one of the two fallopian tubes. In rare cases, ectopic pregnancies can occur in the ovary, abdomen, or cervix. An ectopic pregnancy can occur even if you use birth control.", "Prevention": "Most forms of ectopic pregnancy that occur outside the fallopian tubes are probably not preventable. You may be able to reduce your risk by avoiding conditions that may scar the fallopian tubes. These steps include: Practicing safer sex by taking steps before and during sex, which can prevent you from getting an infection, Getting early diagnosis and treatment of all infections caused by sexual relations (STDs), Stopping smoking . ", "Treatment": "Ectopic pregnancy is life-threatening. The pregnancy cannot continue to birth (term). The developing cells must be removed to save the mother's life.You will need emergency medical help if the area of the ectopic pregnancy breaks open (ruptures). Rupture can lead to bleeding and shock, an emergency condition. Treatment for shock may include:Blood transfusion, Fluids given through a vein, Keeping warm, Oxygen, Raising the legs . If there is a rupture, surgery is done to stop blood loss and remove the pregnancy. In some cases, the doctor may have to remove the fallopian tube.If the ectopic pregnancy has not ruptured, treatment may include:Surgery, Medicine that ends the pregnancy, along with close monitoring by your doctor . "}, "Enteritis": {"description": "Enteritis is inflammation of the small intestine.", "Possible Complications": "Dehydration, Long-term diarrhea . Note: In babies, the diarrhea can cause severe dehydration that comes on very quickly. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea - acute and severe", "Loss of appetite", "Vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests may include:A stool culture to look for the type of infection. However, this test may not always identify the bacteria causing the illness., A colonoscopy and/or upper endoscopy to look at the small intestine and to take tissue samples if needed, X-rays such as CT scan and MRI. ", "Treatment": "Mild cases often do not need treatment.Antidiarrheal medicine is sometimes used. However, it may not be recommended in some cases because it can slow the germ from leaving the digestive tract.You may need rehydration with electrolyte solutions if your body does not have enough fluids.You may need medical care and fluids through a vein (intravenous fluids) if you have diarrhea and cannot keep fluids down. This is often the case with young children.If you take diuretics and develop diarrhea, you may need to stop taking the diuretic. However, do not stop taking any medicine without first talking to your health care provider.You may need to take antibiotics.People who have Crohn's disease will often need to take anti-inflammatory medicines.", "Causes": "Enteritis is most often caused by eating or drinking things that are contaminated with bacteria or viruses. The germs settle in the small intestine and cause inflammation and swelling.Enteritis may also be caused by:An autoimmune condition such as Crohn's disease, Certain drugs, including ibuprofen, naproxen sodium, and cocaine, Damage from radiation therapy, Celiac disease . The inflammation can also involve the stomach (gastritis) and large intestine (colitis).Risk factors include:Recent stomach flu among household members, Recent travel, Exposure to unclean water. Types of enteritis include:Bacterial gastroenteritis, Campylobacter enteritis, E. coli enteritis, Food poisoning, Radiation enteritis, Salmonella enteritis, Shigella enteritis, Staph aureus food poisoning . ", "Prevention": "Always wash your hands after using the toilet and before eating or preparing food or drinks. You may also clean your hands with a 60% alcohol-based product., Boil water that comes from unknown sources, such as streams and outdoor wells, before drinking it., Use only clean utensils for eating or handling foods, especially when handling eggs and poultry., Cook food thoroughly., Use coolers to store food that needs to stay chilled. . "}, "Erythema multiforme": {"description": "Erythema multiforme is a skin disorder\u00a0that comes from an\u00a0allergic reaction or infection.", "Possible Complications": "Body-wide infection (sepsis) \r\n , Loss of body fluids (shock) \r\n , Occasionally, lesions on internal organs causing: \r\n\r\nHeart inflammation (myocarditis), Lung inflammation (pneumonitis), Kidney inflammation (nephritis), Liver inflammation (hepatitis). , Permanent skin damage and scarring, Skin infection (cellulitis). ", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "General ill feeling", "Itching of the skin", "Joint aches", "Multiple skin lesions\u00a0that: \r\n\r\nStart quickly and may return, May spread, May appear as a nodule, papule, or macule and may look like hives, Have a central sore surrounded by pale red rings, also called a \"target\", \"iris\", or \"bulls-eye\", May have vesicles and blisters of various sizes (bullae), Are located on the upper body, legs, arms, palms, hands, or feet, May involve the face or lips, Are usually even on both sides (symmetrical). ", "Start quickly and may return", "May spread", "May appear as a nodule, papule, or macule and may look like hives", "Have a central sore surrounded by pale red rings, also called a \"target\", \"iris\", or \"bulls-eye\"", "May have vesicles and blisters of various sizes (bullae)", "Are located on the upper body, legs, arms, palms, hands, or feet", "May involve the face or lips", "Are usually even on both sides (symmetrical)", "Bloodshot eyes", "Dry eyes", "Eye burning, itching, and discharge", "Eye pain", "Mouth sores", "Vision problems"], "Exams and Tests": "You doctor will look at your skin to diagnose this problem and ask if you have\u00a0a history of risk factors or related diseases.Tests may include:Nikolsky's sign, Skin lesion biopsy, Examination of skin tissue under a microscope. ", "Treatment": "Treatment goals include:Controlling the illness that is causing the condition, Preventing infection, Treating the symptoms. Your doctor may have you stop taking any medicines that may be causing the problem. Do not stop taking medicines without talking to your doctor first.\u00a0Treatment of mild symptoms may include:Medicines such as antihistamines to control itching, Moist compresses applied to the skin, Oral antiviral medicine if\u00a0reaction is caused by herpes simplex, Pain medication recommended by your doctor to reduce fever and discomfort, Topical anesthetics (especially for mouth sores) to ease discomfort that interferes with eating and drinking. Treatment of severe symptoms may include:Antibiotics for skin infections, Corticosteroids to control inflammation, \u00a0treatment in an intensive care or burn care unit for severe cases, Stevens-Johnson syndrome, and toxic epidermal necrolysis, Intravenous immunoglobulins (IVIG) to stop the disease process. Good hygiene and staying away from other people may help prevent secondary infections.You may need skin grafting\u00a0if \u00a0large areas of the body are affected.", "Causes": "Erythema multiforme is a type of hypsersensitivity reaction. It occurs in response to medicines, infections, or illness. Medications that can cause this reaction include:Barbiturates, Penicillins, Phenytoin, Sulfonamides. Infections include:Herpes simplex, Mycoplasma. The exact cause is unknown. The disorder may start with damage to the blood vessels of the skin, that is followed by damage to skin tissues.Some forms of this condition are more severe than others.Erythema multiforme minor is not very serious. Most erythema multiforme is caused by herpes simplex or mycoplasma infections., Erythema multiforme major is more severe. It is also\u00a0and is known as Stevens-Johnson syndrome. This form is usually caused by reactions to medicines, rather than infections. Acetaminophen and nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs have caused very rare cases of Stevens-Johnson syndrome.. Erythema multiforme occurs mostly in children and young adults."}, "Ethanol poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Coma", "Intestinal bleeding", "Slowed breathing", "Slurred speech", "Stupor", "Unable to walk normally", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or 1-800-222-1222 for a local poison control center."}, "Esophagitis": {"description": "See also: Esophagitis herpes", "Possible Complications": "If untreated, esophagitis may cause severe discomfort, and eventual scarring (stricture) of the esophagus. This can cause difficulty swallowing food or medications.A condition called Barrett's esophagus can develop after years of gastroesophageal reflux. Rarely, Barrett's esophagus may lead to cancer of the esophagus.", "Symptoms": ["Cough", " \r\n Difficulty swallowing \r\n ", "Painful swallowing", "Heartburn (acid reflux)", "Hoarseness", "Sore throat "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor may perform the following tests:Esophageal manometry, Esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD), removing a piece of tissue from the esophagus for examination (biopsy), Upper GI series (barium swallow x-ray) . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause. For reflux disease, you may need medications to reduce acid. Infections will\u00a0need to be treated with\u00a0antibiotics.", "Causes": "Esophagitis is\u00a0often caused by fluid that contains acid flowing back from the stomach to the esophagus, a condition called gastroesophageal reflux. An autoimmune disorder called eosinophilic esophagitis also causes this condition.The following increase your risk of esophagitis:Alcohol use, Cigarette smoking, Surgery or radiation to the chest (for example, treatment for lung cancer), Taking certain medications without plenty of water, especially alendronate,\u00a0doxycycline, ibandronate, risedronate, tetracycline, and vitamin C, Vomiting. Persons with weakened immune systems due to HIV and certain medications (such as corticosteroids) may develop infections that lead to esophagitis.Esophageal infection may be due to fungi, yeast (especially Candida infections), or viruses such as herpes or cytomegalovirus."}, "Ectodermal dysplasia": {"description": "Ectodermal dysplasia is a group of conditions in which there is abnormal development of the skin, hair, nails, teeth, or sweat glands.", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage caused by increased body temperature, Seizures caused by high fever (febrile seizures). ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal nails", "Abnormal or missing teeth", "Absent or decreased tears", "Decreased skin color (pigment)", "Heat intolerance", "Inability to sweat", "Large forehead", "Lower than normal number of teeth", "Low nasal bridge", "Poor hearing", "Poor temperature regulation", "Poor vision", "Thin, sparse hair", "Thin skin"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Biopsy of the mucus membranes, Biopsy of the skin, Genetic testing (available for some types of this disorder). ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for this disorder.Some things you can do include:Wear a wig and dentures to improve appearance., Use artificial tears to replace normal tearing and prevent drying of the eyes., Spray the nostrils with saline nose spray often to remove debris and prevent infection., Live in a cooler climate and take cooling water baths or use water sprays to keep a normal body temperature (water evaporating from the skin replaces the cooling function of sweat evaporating from the skin).. ", "Causes": "There are many different types of ectodermal dysplasia.Many gene defects can cause ectodermal dysplasias. The most common form of ectodermal dysplasia usually affects men. Other forms of the disease affect men and women equally.", "Prevention": "If you have a family history of ectodermal dysplasia and you are planning to have children, genetic counseling is recommended. In many cases it is possible to diagnose ectodermal dysplasia while the baby is still in the womb."}, "Ear barotrauma": {"description": "Ear barotrauma is discomfort in the ear due to pressure differences between the inside and outside of the eardrum. It may include damage to the ear. ", "Possible Complications": "Acute ear infection, Hearing loss, Ruptured or perforated eardrum, Vertigo. ", "Symptoms": ["Dizziness", "Ear discomfort or pain in one or both ears", "Hearing loss (slight)", "Sensation of fullness or stuffiness in the ears ", "Ear pain", "Feeling of pressure in the ears (as if underwater)", "Moderate to severe hearing loss", "Nosebleed "], "Exams and Tests": "During an exam of the ear, the health care provider may see a slight outward bulge or inward pull of the eardrum. If the condition is severe, there may be blood or bruising behind the eardrum.Severe barotrauma may be look similar to an ear infection.", "Treatment": "To relieve ear pain or discomfort, you can take steps to open the Eustachian tube and relieve the pressure, such as: Chew gum, Inhale, and then gently exhale while holding the nostrils closed and the mouth shut, Suck on candy, Yawn . When flying, do not sleep as the plane prepares to land. Repeat the listed steps to open the Eustachian tube. For infants and small children, nursing or taking sips of a drink may help.Scuba divers should go down and come up slowly. Diving while you have allergies or a respiratory infection is dangerous. Barotrauma may be severe in these situations.If self-care steps do not ease discomfort within a few hours or the problem is severe, you may need to see a health care provider. You may need medicine to relieve nasal congestion and allow the Eustachian tube to open. These include: Antihistamines, Decongestants taken by mouth, or by a nose spray, Steroids . You may need antibiotics to prevent an ear infection if barotrauma is severe.Rarely, surgery may be needed if other treatments do not work to open the tube. In this procedure, a surgical cut is made in the eardrum to allow pressure to become equal and fluid to drain (myringotomy). If you must change altitude often or you are prone to barotrauma, you may need to have surgery to place tubes in the ear drum. This is not an option for scuba diving.", "Causes": "The air pressure in the middle ear is most often the same as the air pressure outside of the body. The Eustachian tube is a connection between the middle ear and the back of the nose and upper throat.Swallowing or yawning opens the Eustachian tube and allows air to flow into or out of the middle ear. This helps equalize pressure on either side of the ear drum. If the Eustachian tube is blocked, the air pressure in the middle ear is different than the pressure on the outside of the eardrum. This can cause barotrauma.Many people have barotrauma at some time. The problem often occurs with altitude changes, such as flying, scuba diving, or driving in the mountains. If you have a congested nose from allergies, colds, or an upper respiratory infection, you are more likely to develop barotrauma.Blockage of the Eustachian tube could also be present before birth (congenital). It may also be caused by swelling in the throat.", "Prevention": "You can use nasal decongestants or antihistamines before altitude changes. Try to avoid altitude changes while you have an upper respiratory infection or allergy attack.Talk to your doctor about using decongestants if you plan to scuba dive."}, "Ellis-van Creveld syndrome": {"description": "Ellis-van Creveld syndrome is a rare genetic disorder that affects bone growth.", "Possible Complications": "Bone abnormalities, Breathing difficulty, Congenital heart disease (CHD) especially atrial septal defect (ASD), Kidney disease. ", "Symptoms": ["Cleft lip or palate", "Epispadias or undescended testicle (cryptorchidism)", "Extra fingers (polydactyly)", "Limited range of motion", "Nail problems, including missing or deformed nails", "Short arms and legs, especially forearm and lower leg", "Short height (between 3 1/2 and 5 feet tall)", "Sparse, absent, or fine textured hair", "Tooth abnormalities: \r\n\r\nPeg teeth, Widely-spaced teeth, Teeth present at birth (natal teeth), Delayed or missing teeth. ", "Peg teeth", "Widely-spaced teeth", "Teeth present at birth (natal teeth)", "Delayed or missing teeth"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs of this condition include:Growth hormone deficiency, Heart defects, such as a hole in the heart (atrial septal defect), occur in about half of all cases. Tests include:Chest x-ray, Echocardiogram, Genetic testing may be\u00a0performed for mutations in one of the two EVC genes, Skeletal x-ray, Ultrasound, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on which body system is affected and the severity of the problem. The condition itself is not treatable, but many of the complications can be treated.", "Causes": "Ellis-van Creveld is passed down through families (inherited). It is caused by defects in one of two Ellis-van Creveld syndrome genes (EVC and EVC2) that are positioned next to each other on the same chromosome.The severity of the disease varies from person to person. The highest rate of the condition is seen among the Old Order Amish population of Lancaster County, Pennsylvania. It is fairly rare in the general population.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for prospective parents from a high-risk group, or who have a family history of Ellis-van Creveld syndrome."}, "Ectopic heartbeat": {"Symptoms": ["Feeling your heart beat (palpitations)", "Feeling like your heart stopped or skipped a beat", "Feeling of occasional, forceful beats"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show an occasional uneven pulse. If the ectopic heartbeats do not occur very often, your doctor may not find them during a physical exam.Blood pressure is most often normal.The following tests may be done:Continuous ambulatory cardiac monitoring (Holter monitor, patient-activated recording device, or implanted loop recorder), Coronary angiography, ECG, Echocardiogram. ", "description": "The two most common types of ectopic heartbeats are:", "Causes": "Sometimes ectopic heartbeats are seen with:Changes in the blood, such as a low potassium level (hypokalemia), Decrease in blood supply to the heart, Heart muscle disease (cardiomyopathy) . Ectopic beats may be caused or made worse by smoking, alcohol use, caffeine, stimulant medicines, and some street drugs.Ectopic heartbeats are rare in children without heart disease that was present at birth (congenital). Most extra heartbeats in children are premature atrial contractions (PACs). These are almost always harmless.In adults, ectopic heartbeats are common. They are most often due to PACs or PVCs. Your doctor should look into the cause, but no treatment is needed most of the time. ", "Treatment": "The following may help reduce ectopic heartbeats for some people:Limiting caffeine, alcohol, and tobacco , Regular exercise for people who are inactive. Most ectopic heartbeats do not need to be treated. The condition is only treated if your symptoms are severe or if the extra beats occur very often.The cause of the heartbeats, if it can be found, may also need to be treated."}, "Ebstein's anomaly": {"description": "The condition is congenital, which means it is present\u00a0at birth.", "Possible Complications": "A severe leakage can lead to swelling of the heart and liver, and congestive heart failure.Other complications may include:Abnormal heart rhythms (arrhythmias), including abormally fast rhythms (tachyarrhythmias) and abnormally slow rhythms (bradyarrhythmias and heart block), Blood clots from the heart to other parts of the body, Brain abscess. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough", "Failure to grow", "Fatigue", "Rapid breathing", "Shortness of breath", "Very fast heartbeat "], "Exams and Tests": "Newborns who have a severe leakage across the tricuspid valve will have very low levels of oxygen in their blood and significant heart swelling. The doctor may hear abnormal heart sounds, such as murmur, when listening to the chest with a stethoscope.Tests that can help diagnose this condition include:Chest x-ray, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the heart, Measurement of the electrical activity of the heart (EKG), Ultrasound of the heart (echocardiogram). ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the severity of the defect and the specific symptoms. Medical care may include:Medications to help with heart failure, Oxygen and other breathing support, Surgery to correct the valve may be needed for children who continue to worsen or who have more serious complications. ", "Causes": "The tricuspid valve is normally made of three parts, called leaflets or flaps. The leaflets open to allow blood to move from the right atrium (top chamber) to the right ventricle (bottom chamber) while the heart relaxes. They close to prevent blood from moving from the right ventricle to the right atrium while the heart pumps.In persons with Ebstein's anomaly, the leaflets are unusually deep in the right ventricle. The leaflets are often larger than normal. The defect usually causes the valve to work poorly, and blood may go the wrong way. Instead of flowing out to the lungs,\u00a0the blood\u00a0flows back into the right atrium. The backup of blood flow can lead to heart swelling and fluid buildup in the body. There may be narrowing of the valve that leads to the lungs (pulmonary valve).In many cases, patients also have a hole in the wall separating the heart's two upper chambers and blood flow across this hole may cause oxygen-poor blood to go to the body. This can cause cyanosis, a blueish tint to the skin caused by oxygen-poor blood.Ebstein's anomaly occurs as a baby develops in the womb. The exact cause is unknown, although the use of certain drugs (such as lithium or benzodiazepines) during pregnancy may play a role. The condition is rare. It is more common in white people.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention, other than talking with your doctor before a pregnancy if you are taking medicines that are thought to be related to developing this disease. You may be able to prevent some of the complications of the disease. For example, taking antibiotics before dental surgery may help prevent endocarditis."}, "Essential tremor": {"description": "Essential tremor is a type of involuntary shaking movement in which no cause can be identified. Involuntary means you shake without trying to do so.", "Possible Complications": "Sometimes the tremors affect the vocal cords, which may lead to speech problems.", "Symptoms": ["Head nodding", "Shaking or quivering sound to the voice if the tremor affects the voice box", "Problems with writing, drawing, drinking from a cup, or using tools if the tremor affects the hands", "Occur\u00a0during movement (action-related tremor) and may be less noticeable with rest", "Come and go, but often get worse\u00a0with age", "Worsen with stress, caffeine, and certain medications", "Not affect both sides of the body the same way"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor can make the diagnosis by performing a physical exam and asking questions about your medical and personal history.A physical exam will show shaking with movement, usually small movements that are faster than 5 times per second. There are usually no problems with coordination or mental function.Further tests may be needed to rule out other reasons for the tremors. Other causes of tremors may include:Smoking and smokeless tobacco, Overactive thyroid (hyperthyroidism), Suddenly stopping alcohol after drinking a lot for a long time (alcohol withdrawal), Too much caffeine, Use of certain medications, Nervousness or anxiety. Blood tests and imaging studies (such as a CT scan of the head, brain MRI, and x-rays) are usually normal.", "Treatment": "Treatment may not be needed unless the tremors interfere with your daily activities or cause embarrassment.HOME CAREFor tremors made worse by stress, try techniques that help you relax. For tremors of any cause, avoid caffeine and get enough sleep.For tremors caused or made worse by a medication, talk to your doctor about stopping the drug, reducing the dosage, or switching. Do not change or stop medications on your own.Severe tremors make it harder to do daily activities. You may need help with these activities. Things that can help include:Buying clothes with Velcro fasteners, or using button hooks, Cooking or eating with utensils that have a larger handle, Using straws to drink, Wearing slip-on shoes and using shoehorns . MEDICINES FOR TREMORMedicines may help relieve symptoms. The most commonly used drugs include:Propranolol, a beta blocker, Primidone, a drug used to treat seizures . These drugs can have side effects.Propranolol may cause fatigue, stuffy nose, or slow heartbeat, and it may make asthma worse., Primidone may cause drowsiness, problems concentrating, nausea, and problems with walking, balance, and coordination. . Other medications that may reduce tremors include:Antiseizure drugs, Mild tranquilizers, Blood pressure drugs called calcium-channel blockers . Botox injections given in the hand may be tried to reduce tremors.SURGERYIn severe cases, surgery may be tried. This may include:Focusing high-powered x-rays on a small area of the brain (stereotactic radiosurgery), Implanting a stimulating device in the brain to signal the area that controls movement . ", "Causes": "Essential tremor is the most common type of tremor. Everyone has some tremor present, but the movements are often so small that they cannot be seen. Essential tremor affects men and women and is most common in people older than 65. The exact cause of essential tremor is unknown. Some research suggests that the part of the brain that controls muscle movements does not work correctly in patients with essential tremor.If an essential tremor occurs in more than one member of a family, it is called a familial tremor. This type of essential tremor is passed down through families (inherited). This suggests that genes play a role in its cause.Familial tremor is usually a dominant trait. This means that you only need to get the gene from one parent to develop the tremor. It often starts in early middle age, but may be seen in people who are older or younger.", "Prevention": "Alcoholic beverages in small quantities may decrease tremors. But alcohol abuse may develop, especially if you have a family history of such problems. "}, "Endometriosis": {"description": "Endometriosis occurs when cells from the lining of your womb (uterus) grow in other areas of your body. This can cause pain, heavy bleeding, bleeding between periods, and problems getting pregnant (infertility).", "Possible Complications": "Endometriosis can lead to problems getting pregnant. However, most women with mild symptoms can still get pregnant. Laparoscopy to remove growths and scar tissue may help improve your chances of becoming pregnant. If it does not, you may want to consider fertility treatments.Other complications of endometriosis include:Long-term pelvic pain that interferes with social and work activities, Large cysts in the pelvis that may break open (rupture). In rare cases, endometriosis tissue may block the intestines or urinary tract. Very rarely, cancer may develop in the areas of tissue growth after menopause.", "Symptoms": ["Painful periods", "Pain in your lower belly before and during your period", "Cramps for a week or two before and during your period. Cramps may be steady and range from dull to severe.", "Pain during or following sexual intercourse", "Pain with bowel movements", "Pelvic or low back pain that may occur at any time"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam, including a pelvic exam. You may have one of these tests to help diagnose the disease:Transvaginal ultrasound, Pelvic laparoscopy. ", "Treatment": "What type of treatment you have depends on:Your age, Severity of your symptoms, Severity of the disease, Whether you want children in the future . There are different treatment options.PAIN RELIEVERSIf you have mild symptoms, you may be able to manage cramping and pain with:Exercise and relaxation techniques, Over-the-counter pain relievers. These include ibuprofen (Advil), naproxen (Aleve), and acetaminophen (Tylenol)., Prescription painkillers, if needed, for more severe pain, Regular exams every 6 - 12 months so your doctor can make sure the disease is not\u00a0getting worse . HORMONE THERAPYThese medicines can stop endometriosis from getting worse. They may be given as pills, nasal spray, or shots. Only women who are not trying get pregnant should have this therapy. Hormone therapy will prevent you from getting pregnant. Once you stop therapy, you can get pregnant again. Birth control pills. With this therapy, you take pills for 6 - 9 months without stopping. Taking these pills relieves most symptoms. However, it does not prevent scarring or treat any damage that has already occurred. Progesterone pills or injections. This treatment helps shrink growths. However, side effects can include weight gain and depression.Gonadotropin-agonist medications. These medicines stop your ovaries from producing the hormone estrogen. This causes a menopause-like state. Side effects include hot flashes, vaginal dryness, and mood changes. Treatment is usually limited to 6 months because it can weaken your bones. SURGERYYour doctor may recommend surgery if you have severe pain that does not get better with other treatments. Laparoscopy helps diagnose the disease and can also remove growths and scar tissue. Because only a small cut is made in your belly, you will heal faster than other types of surgery., Laparotomy involves making a large incision (cut) in your belly to remove growths and scar tissue. This is major surgery, so healing takes longer., Laparoscopy or laparotomy may be a good option if you want to become pregnant, because they treat the disease and leave your organs in place., Hysterectomy is surgery to remove your uterus, fallopian tubes, and ovaries. If your ovaries are not removed, symptoms may return. You would only have this surgery if you have severe symptoms and do not want to have children in the future. . ", "Causes": "Every month, a woman's ovaries produce hormones that tell the cells lining the uterus to swell and get thicker. Your uterus sheds these cells along with blood and tissue through your vagina when you have your period.Endometriosis occurs when these cells grow outside the uterus in other parts of your body. This tissue may attach on your:Ovaries, Bowel, Rectum, Bladder, Lining of your pelvic area . It can grow in other areas of the body, too.These growths stay in your body--they do not shed when you have your period. But, like the cells in your uterus, these growths react to the hormones from your ovaries. They grow and bleed when you get your period. Over time, the growths may add more tissue and blood. The buildup of blood and tissue in your body leads to pain and other symptoms.No one knows what causes endometriosis. One idea is that when you get your period, the cells may travel backwards through the fallopian tubes into the pelvis. Once there, the cells attach and grow. However, this backward period flow occurs in many women. Researchers think that the immune system in women with endometriosis may cause the condition.Endometriosis is common. Sometimes, it may run in families. Endometriosis probably starts when a woman begins having periods. However, it usually isn't diagnosed until ages 25 - 35.You are more likely to develop endometriosis if you:Have a mother or sister with endometriosis, Started your period at a young age, Never had children, Have frequent periods or they last 7 or more days, Have a closed hymen, which blocks the flow of menstrual blood during the period . ", "Prevention": "Birth control pills may help to prevent or slow down the development of the endometriosis."}, "Encephalitis": {"description": "Encephalitis is irritation and swelling (inflammation) of the brain, most often due to infections.", "Possible Complications": "Permanent brain damage may occur in severe cases of encephalitis. It can affect:Hearing, Memory, Muscle control, Sensation, Speech, Vision . ", "Symptoms": ["Fever that is not very high", "Mild headache", "Low energy and a poor appetite", "Clumsiness, unsteady gait", "Confusion, disorientation", "Drowsiness", "Irritability or poor temper control", "Light sensitivity", "Stiff neck and back (sometimes)", "Vomiting ", "Body stiffness", "Irritability and crying more often (these symptoms may get worse when the baby is picked up)", "Poor feeding", "Soft spot on the top of the head may bulge out more", "Vomiting", "Loss of consciousness, poor responsiveness, stupor, coma", "Muscle weakness or paralysis", "Seizures", "Severe headache", "Sudden change in mental functions, such a flat mood, impaired judgment, memory loss, or a lack of interest in daily activities "], "Exams and Tests": "An examination may show:Abnormal reflexes, Increased intracranial pressure, Mental confusion, Mouth ulcers, Muscle weakness, Neck stiffness, Signs in other organs, such as the liver and lungs, Skin rash, Speech problems. Tests may include:Brain MRI, CT scan of the head, Culture of cerebrospinal fluid (CSF), blood, or urine (however, this test is rarely useful), Electroencephalogram (EEG), Lumbar puncture and CSF examination, Tests that detect antibodies to a virus (serology tests), Test that detects tiny amounts of virus DNA (polymerase chain reaction -- PCR). ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to provide supportive care (rest, nutrition, fluids) to help the body fight the infection, and to relieve symptoms. Medications may include:Antiviral medicines, if a virus caused the infection, Antibiotics, if bacteria is the cause, Antiseizure medicines to prevent seizures, Steroids to reduce brain swelling , Sedatives for irritability or restlessness, Acetaminophen for fever and headache. If brain function is severely affected, physical therapy and speech therapy may be needed after the infection is controlled.", "Causes": "Encephalitis is a rare condition. It occurs more often in the first year of life and decreases with age. The very young and older adults are more likely to have a severe case.Encephalitis is most often caused by a viral infection. Many types of viruses may cause it. Exposure to viruses can occur through:Breathing in respiratory droplets from an infected person, Contaminated food or drink, Mosquito, tick, and other insect bites, Skin contact. Different viruses occur in different locations. Many cases occur during a certain season.Encephalitis caused by the herpes simplex virus is the leading cause of more severe cases in all ages, including newborns.Routine vaccination has greatly reduced encephalitis due to some viruses, including:Measles, Mumps, Polio, Rabies, Rubella, Varicella (chickenpox). Other viruses that cause encephalitis include:Adenovirus, Coxsackievirus, Cytomegalovirus, Eastern equine encephalitis virus, Echovirus, Japanese encephalitis, which occurs in Asia, West Nile virus. After the virus enters the body, the brain tissue swells. This swelling may destroy nerve cells, and cause bleeding in the brain and brain damage.Other causes of encephalitis may include:An allergic reaction to vaccinations, Autoimmune disease, Bacteria such as Lyme disease, syphilis, and tuberculosis, Parasites such as roundworms, cysticercosis, and toxoplasmosis in AIDS patients and other people who have a weakened immune system, The effects of cancer . ", "Prevention": "Children and adults should avoid contact with anyone who has encephalitis.Controlling mosquitoes (a mosquito bite can transmit some viruses) may reduce the chance of some infections that can lead to encephalitis.Apply an insect repellant containing the chemical, DEET when you go outside (but do not use DEET products on infants younger than 2 months)., Remove any sources of standing water (such as old tires, cans, gutters, and wading pools)., Wear long-sleeved shirts and pants when outside, especially at dusk.. Children and adults should get routine vaccinations for viruses that can cause encephalitis. People should receive specific vaccines if they are traveling to places such as parts of Asia, where Japanese encephalitis is found.Vaccinate animals to prevent encephalitis caused by the rabies virus."}, "Epidural hematoma": {"description": "An epidural hematoma is bleeding between the inside of the skull and the outer covering of the brain (called the \"dura\").", "Possible Complications": "There is a risk of permanent brain injury, even if\u00a0the disorder is treated. Symptoms (such as seizures) may persist for several months, even after treatment. In time they\u00a0may become less frequent or disappear completely. Seizures may begin up to 2 years after the injury.In adults, most recovery occurs in the first 6 months. Usually there is some improvement over approximately 2 years. Children usually recover more quickly and completely than adults.Brain damage can lead to incomplete recovery. Other complications include permanent symptoms, such as: Herniation of the brain and permanent coma, Normal pressure hydrocephalus, which can lead to weakness, headaches, incontinence, and difficulty walking, Paralysis or loss of sensation (which began at the time of the injury) . ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness or altered level of alertness", "Enlarged pupil in one eye", "Headache (severe)", "Head injury or trauma followed by loss of consciousness, a period of alertness, then rapid deterioration back to unconsciousness", "Nausea or vomiting", "Weakness\u00a0in part of the body, usually on the opposite side from the side with the enlarged pupil "], "Exams and Tests": "The brain and nervous system (neurological) examination may show that a specific part of the brain is\u00a0not working well\u00a0(for instance, there may be arm weakness on one side). The exam may\u00a0also indicate increased intracranial pressure.If there is increased intracranial pressure, emergency surgery may be needed to relieve the pressure and prevent further brain injury.A head CT scan will confirm the diagnosis of epidural hematoma, and will pinpoint the exact location of the hematoma and any associated skull fracture.", "Treatment": "An epidural hematoma is an emergency condition. Treatment goals include:Taking measures to save the person's life, Controlling symptoms, Minimizing or preventing permanent damage to the brain. Life support measures may be required. Emergency surgery is almost always necessary to reduce pressure within the brain. This may include drilling a small hole in the skull to relieve pressure and allow blood to drain\u00a0from the brain.Large hematomas or solid blood clots may need to be removed through a larger opening in the skull (craniotomy).Medications used in addition to surgery will vary according to the type and severity of symptoms and brain damage that occurs.Anticonvulsant medications (such as phenytoin) may be used to control or prevent seizures. Some medications called \"hyperosmotic agents\" (like mannitol, glycerol, and hypertonic saline) may be used to reduce brain swelling.", "Causes": "An epidural hematoma is often caused by a skull fracture during childhood or adolescence. This type of bleeding is more common in young people because the membrane covering the brain is not as firmly attached to the skull as it is in older people.An epidural hematoma occurs when there is a rupture of a blood vessel, usually an artery. The blood vessel then bleeds into the space between the \"dura mater\" and the skull. The affected vessels are often torn by skull fractures. The fractures\u00a0are most often the result of a severe head injury, such as those caused by motorcycle or automobile accidents. Epidural hematomas can be caused by bleeding from a vein (venous bleeding) in young children.Rapid bleeding causes a collection of blood (hematoma) that presses on the brain. The pressure inside the head (intracranial pressure) increases quickly. This pressure may result in additional brain injury.An extradural hemorrhage is an emergency. It may lead to permanent brain damage and death if left untreated. It may get worse very quickly, progressing\u00a0from drowsiness to coma and death\u00a0within minutes to hours.", "Prevention": "An\u00a0epidural hematoma\u00a0may not be preventable once a head injury has occurred.To minimize the risk of head injury, use appropriate safety equipment (such as hard hats, bicycle or motorcycle helmets, and seat belts).Follow general safety rules. For example, do not dive into water if the water depth is unknown or if rocks may be present. Use appropriate safety precautions in sports, recreation, and work. Drive safely."}, "Esophagitis - infectious": {"description": "Infection in the esophagus may be due to:", "Possible Complications": "Holes in your esophagus (perforations), Infection at other sites, Recurrent infection. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty swallowing and painful swallowing", "Fever and chills", "Oral thrush (with candida)", "Sores in the mouth or back of the throat (with herpes or cytomegalovirus) "], "Exams and Tests": "Blood and urine tests for cytomegalovirus (CMV), Culture of cells from the esophagus for herpes or CMV, Mouth or throat swab culture for candida . ", "Treatment": "In most people with esophagitis, medicines can control the infection:Antiviral medication such as acyclovir, famciclovir, or valacyclovir can treat a herpes infection., Antifungal medicines such as fluconazole (taken by mouth), caspofungin (given by injection), or amphotericin (given by injection) can treat candida infection., Antiviral medicines that are given through a vein (intravenously), such as ganciclovir or foscarnet can treat CMV infection. In some cases, a medicine called valganciclovir, which is taken by mouth, can be used for CMV infection.. Some people may also need pain medicine.Many people who are treated for an episode of infectious esophagitis need other, long-term medicines to suppress the virus or fungus, and to prevent the infection from coming back.", "Causes": "Infection of the esophagus is rare in people whose immune system works well.A weakened immune system raises your risk for this type of infection, and makes it harder to treat.Common causes include:HIV /AIDS, Chemotherapy, Diabetes, Leukemia or lymphoma, Organ transplants (due to drugs that suppress the immune system), Other conditions that suppress or weaken your immune system. ", "Prevention": "The herpes simplex virus can be contagious by direct contact, so avoid contact with known herpes sores (lesions)."}, "Epidural abscess": {"description": "An epidural abscess is a collection of pus (infected material) between the outer covering of the brain and spinal cord and the bones of the skull or spine. The abscess causes swelling in the area.", "Possible Complications": "Brain abscess, Brain damage, Bone infection (osteomyelitis), Chronic back pain, Meningitis, Nerve damage\r\n , Return of infection , Spinal cord abscess. ", "Symptoms": ["Bowel or bladder incontinence", "Difficulty urinating (urinary retention)", "Fever and back pain", "Fever", "Headache", "Lethargy", "Nausea and vomiting", "Pain at the site of recent surgery that gets worse (especially if fever is present)", "Decreased ability to move any part of the body", "Loss of sensation in any area of the body, or abnormal changes in sensation", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform an exam to look for a loss of functions such as movement or sensation.Tests may include:Blood cultures, Complete blood count (CBC), CT scan of head or spine, Draining of abscess and examination of the material, MRI of head or spine. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to cure the infection and reduce the risk of permanent damage. Treatment usually includes antibiotics and surgery. In rare cases, antibiotics alone are used.Antibiotics are usually given through a vein (IV) for at least 4 - 6 weeks. However, some people may need to take them for a longer time, depending on the type of bacteria and severity of the disease.Surgery is usually needed to drain or remove the abscess. In addition, surgery is often needed to reduce pressure on the spinal cord or brain, to prevent further loss of function.", "Causes": "Epidural abscess is a rare disorder caused by infection in the area between the bones of the skull or spine, and the membranes covering the brain and spinal cord (meninges). This infection is called an intracranial epidural abscess if it is inside the skull area, or a spinal epidural abscess if it is found in the spine area. Most are located in the spine.The spinal\u00a0infection is usually caused by bacteria (Staphylococcus aureus is most common), but may be caused by fungus. It can be due to other infections in the body (especially a urinary tract infection), or germs that spread through the blood. However, in some patients, no other source of infection is found.An\u00a0intracranial epidural abscess (within the skull). Risk factors include:Chronic ear infections, Chronic sinusitis, Head injury, Mastoiditis, Recent neurosurgery. A spinal epidural abscess may be seen in patients with:A history of back surgery or other invasive procedures involving the spine, Bloodstream infections, Boils especially on the back or scalp, Bone infections of the spine (vertebral osteomyelitis). People who inject drugs are also at increased risk.", "Prevention": "Treatment of certain infections, such as ear infections, sinusitis, and bloodstream infections, may decrease the risk of an epidural abscess. Early diagnosis and treatment are essential to prevent complications."}, "Elephant ear": {"Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Redness, pain, and burning of the eyes", "Severe burning in the mouth and throat", "Swelling of the tongue, mouth, and eyes", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Enterovirus D68": {"Symptoms": ["Fever", "Runny nose", "Sneezing", "Cough", "Body and muscle aches", "Wheezing", "Difficulty Breathing"], "description": "To learn more about the 2014 outbreak, please visit the CDC web page http://www.cdc.gov/non-polio-enterovirus/about/EV-D68.html.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for EV-D68. In most cases, the illness will go away on its own. You can treat symptoms with over-the-counter medicines for pain and fever. Do NOT give aspirin to children under the age of 18.People with severe breathing problems may need to go to the hospital. They will receive treatment to help relieve symptoms."}, "Ear emergencies": {"Symptoms": ["Bleeding from the ear", "Bruising or redness", "Clear liquid coming out of the ear (brain fluid)", "Dizziness", "Earache", "Loss of hearing", "Nausea and vomiting", "Noises in the ear", "Sensations of an object in the ear", "Swelling", "Visible object in the ear"], "Causes": "Pain, hearing loss, dizziness, ringing in the ear, and ruptured eardrums can be caused by:Inserting cotton swabs, toothpicks, pins, pens, or other objects into the ear, Sudden changes in pressure, as from an explosion, blow to the head, flying, scuba diving, falling while water skiing, or being slapped on the head or ear, Loud sounds, such as a gun firing . ", "description": "Ear emergencies include objects in the ear canal and ruptured eardrums.", "Prevention": "Never put anything in the ear canal without first talking to a health care provider., Never\u00a0hit\u00a0the head to try to correct an ear problem., Teach children not to put things in their ears., Avoid cleaning the ear canals altogether., After an ear injury, avoid nose blowing and getting water in the injured ear., Treat ear infections right away.. If you tend to feel pain and pressure in your ears when flying:Drink a lot of fluid before and during the flight. , Avoid the use of alcohol, caffeine, or tobacco on the day of the flight. , Chew gum, suck on hard candy, or yawn during take-off and landing. , Talk to your doctor about taking a decongestant or using a nasal spray before you fly.. "}, "Episcleritis": {"description": "Episcleritis is irritation and inflammation of the episclera, a thin layer of tissue covering the white part (sclera) of the eye. It is not an infection.", "Possible Complications": "In some cases, the condition may return. Rarely, irritation and inflammation of the white part of the eye may develop. This is called scleritis.", "Symptoms": ["A pink or purple color to the normally white part of the eye", "Eye pain", "Eye tenderness", "Sensitivity to light", "Tearing of the eye"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will do an eye exam to diagnose the disorder. Most of the time, no special tests are needed.", "Treatment": "The condition most often goes away on its own in 1 to 2 weeks. Using corticosteroid eye drops may help ease the symptoms faster.", "Causes": "Episcleritis is a common condition. In most cases the problem is mild and vision is normal. The cause is often unknown. But, it may occur with certain diseases, such as:Herpes zoster, Rheumatoid arthritis, Sjogren syndrome, Syphilis, Tuberculosis. "}, "Epididymitis": {"description": "Epididymitis is swelling (inflammation) of the tube that connects the testicle with the vas deferens. The tube is called the epididymis. ", "Possible Complications": "Complications include:Abscess in the scrotum, Chronic epididymitis , Opening on the skin of the scrotum , Death of testicular tissue due to lack of blood (testicular infarction), Infertility. Sudden and severe pain in the scrotum is a medical emergency. You need to be seen by a health care professional right away. ", "Symptoms": ["Blood in the semen", "Discharge from the urethra (the opening at the end of the penis)", "Discomfort in the lower abdomen or pelvis", "Fever", "Lump near the testicle", "Pain during ejaculation", "Pain or burning during urination", "Painful scrotal swelling (epididymis is enlarged)", "Tender, swollen, and painful groin area on affected side", "Testicle pain that gets worse during a bowel movement "], "Exams and Tests": "Physical exam will show a red, tender lump on the affected side of the scrotum. Tenderness is most often centered in a small area of the testicle where the epididymis is attached. A large area of swelling may develop around the lump. The lymph nodes in the groin area may also be enlarged, and there may be discharge from the penis. A rectal exam may show an enlarged or tender prostate.These tests may be performed:Complete blood count (CBC), Doppler ultrasound, Testicular scan (nuclear medicine scan), Urinalysis and culture (you may need to give several specimens, including initial stream, mid-stream, and after a prostate massage), Tests for chlamydia and gonorrhea . This condition may appear like testicular torsion, in which the blood supply to the testicle is cut off. It is important to make the distinction because testicular torsion is an emergency. Surgery is needed as soon as possible in a case of testicular torsion..", "Treatment": "Your health care provider will prescribe medicine to treat the infection. Sexually transmitted infections need specific antibiotics. Your sexual partners should also be treated. You may need pain medicines and anti-inflammatory medications.If the condition is caused by taking amiodarone, you will need to lower your dose or change your medicine.To ease discomfort:Rest lying down with the scrotum elevated., Apply ice packs to the painful area.. You will need to follow up with your health care provider to make sure the infection has cleared completely. ", "Causes": "Epididymitis is most common in young men ages 19\u00a0to 35. It is most often caused by the spread of a bacterial infection. Infection often begins in the urethra, the prostate, or the bladder. Gonorrhea and chlamydia infections are most often the cause the problem in young heterosexual men. In children and older men, it is more commonly caused by E. coli and similar bacteria. This is also true in homosexual men.Mycobacterium tuberculosis (TB) can cause epididymitis. Other bacteria (such as Ureaplasma) may also cause the condition.Another cause of epididymitis is the use of a medicine called amiodarone, which prevents abnormal heart rhythms.The following increase the risk for epididymitis:Being uncircumcised, Recent surgery, Past structural problems in the urinary tract, Regular use of a urethral catheter, Sexual intercourse with more than one partner and not using condoms . ", "Prevention": "You can prevent complications from epididymitis by getting diagnosed and treated early. Your doctor may prescribe antibiotics before a surgery that could raise the risk for epididymitis. Practicing safe sex (including avoiding multiple sexual partners and using condoms) may help prevent epididymitis caused by sexually-transmitted diseases."}, "Epiglottitis": {"description": "Epiglottitis is inflammation of the epiglottis. This is the tissue that covers the trachea (windpipe). Epiglottitis is a life-threatening disease.", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal breathing sounds (stridor)", "Fever", "Blue skin color (cyanosis)", "Drooling", "Difficulty breathing (patient may need to sit upright and lean slightly forward to breathe)", "Difficulty swallowing", "Voice changes (hoarseness) "], "Exams and Tests": "Epiglottitis is a medical emergency. Seek immediate medical help. Do not use anything to press the tongue down to try to look at the throat at home. Doing so may make the condition worse.The health care provider may examine the voice box (larynx) using a small mirror held against the back of the throat. Or a viewing tube called a laryngoscope may be used. This examination is best done in the operating room or a similar setting where sudden breathing problems can be more easily handled. Tests that may be done include:Blood culture or throat culture, Complete blood count (CBC), Neck x-ray . ", "Causes": "The epiglottis is a stiff, yet flexible tissue (called cartilage) at the back of the tongue. It closes your windpipe (trachea) when you swallow so food does not enter your airway. This helps prevent coughing or choking after swallowing.Swelling of the epiglottis is usually caused by the bacteria Haemophilus influenzae (H. influenzae). It may also be due to other bacteria or viruses that can cause upper respiratory infections.Epiglottitis is now very uncommon because the H. influenzae type B (Hib) vaccine is a routine childhood immunization. The disease was once most often seen in children ages 2 through 6. In rare cases, epiglottitis can occur in adults.", "Prevention": "The Hib vaccine protects most children from epiglottitis.The most common bacteria (H. influenzae) that causes epiglottitis is contagious. If someone in your family is sick from this bacteria, other family members need to be tested and treated.", "Treatment": "A hospital stay is needed, usually in the intensive care unit (ICU).Treatment involves methods to help the person breathe, including:Breathing tube (intubation), Moistened (humidified) oxygen. Other treatments may include:Antibiotics to treat the infection, Anti-inflammatory medicines, called corticosteroids, to decrease throat swelling, Fluids given through a vein (by IV). "}, "Expressive language disorder - developmental": {"description": "Developmental expressive language disorder is a condition in which a child has lower than normal ability in vocabulary, producing complex sentences, and remembering words. However, a child with this disorder may have the normal language skills needed to understand verbal or written communication.", "Possible Complications": "Learning problems, Low self-esteem, Social problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Below-average vocabulary skills", "Improper use of tenses (past, present, future)", "Problems making complex sentences", "Problems remembering words "], "Exams and Tests": "Standardized expressive language and nonverbal intellectual tests should be conducted if an expressive language disorder is suspected. Testing for other learning disabilities may also be needed.", "Treatment": "Language therapy is the best method to treat this type of disorder. The goal of this therapy is to increase the number of phrases a child can use. This is done by using block-building techniques and speech therapy.", "Causes": "Expressive language disorder is common in school-aged\u00a0children.The causes are not well understood. Damage to the cerebrum of the brain and malnutrition may cause some cases. Genetic factors may also be involved. ", "Prevention": "Good nutrition during pregnancy and early childhood and prenatal care may help. "}, "Entropion": {"description": "Entropion is the turning in of an edge of an eyelid, causing the lashes to rub against the eye. It most often is seen on the lower eyelid.", "Possible Complications": "Dry eye and irritation may increase the risk of: Corneal abrasions, Corneal ulcers, Eye infections. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased vision if the cornea is damaged", "Excessive tearing", "Eye discomfort or pain", "Eye irritation", "Redness "], "Exams and Tests": "In most cases, your health care provider can diagnose this condition by looking at your eyelids. Special tests are not often necessary.", "Treatment": "Artificial tears can keep the eye from becoming dry and may help you feel better. Surgery to correct the position of the eyelids works well in most cases.", "Causes": "Entropion can be present at birth (congenital).In babies, it rarely causes problems because the lashes are very soft and do not easily damage the eye. In older people, the condition is most often caused by a spasm or weakening of the muscles surrounding the lower part of the eye. Another cause can be trachoma infection, which can lead to scarring of the inner side of the lid. This is rare in North America and Europe. However, trachoma scarring is one of the three leading causes of blindness in the world.Risk factors for entropion are:Aging, Chemical burn, Infection with trachoma . ", "Prevention": "Most cases cannot be prevented. Treatment reduces the risk of complications.See your health care provider if you have red eyes after visiting an area where there is trachoma (such as North Africa or South Asia)."}, "Esophageal cancer": {"description": "Esophageal cancer is a cancerous (malignant) tumor of the esophagus. This is\u00a0the tube that moves food from the mouth to the stomach.", "Possible Complications": "Pneumonia, Severe weight loss from not eating enough. ", "Symptoms": ["Backwards movement of food through the esophagus and possibly mouth (regurgitation)", "Chest pain\u00a0not related to eating", "Difficulty swallowing solids or liquids", "Heartburn", "Vomiting blood", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests used to help diagnose esophageal cancer may include:Barium swallow, Chest MRI or thoracic CT (usually used to help determine the stage of the disease), Endoscopic ultrasound (also sometimes used to determine the stage of disease), Esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD) and biopsy, PET scan (sometimes useful for determining the stage of disease, and whether surgery is possible). Stool testing may show small amounts of blood in the stool.", "Treatment": "Upper endoscopy (EGD) will be used to obtain a tissue sample from the esophagus to diagnose cancer.When\u00a0the cancer is only in the esophagus and has not spread, surgery will be done. The cancer and part, or all, of the esophagus is removed. The surgery may be done using:Open surgery, during which one or two larger incisions are made., Minimally invasive surgery, during which a\u00a02 - 4 small incisions are made in the belly. A laparoscope with a tiny camera is inserted into\u00a0the belly through one of the incisions. . Radiation therapy may also be used instead of surgery in some cases when the cancer has not spread outside the esophagus. Either\u00a0chemotherapy, radiation, or both may be used to shrink the tumor and make surgery easier to perform.If the patient is too ill to have major surgery or the cancer has spread to other organs, chemotherapy or radiation may be used to help reduce symptoms. This is called palliative therapy. In such cases, the disease is usually not curable.Beside a change in diet, other treatments that may be used to help the patient swallow include:Dilating (widening)\u00a0the esophagus using an endoscope. Sometimes a stent is placed to keep the esophagus open., A feeding tube into the stomach., Photodynamic therapy, in which a special drug is injected into the tumor and is then exposed to light. The light activates the medicine that attacks the tumor.. ", "Causes": "Esophageal cancer is not common in the United States. It occurs most often in men over 50 years old.There are two main types of esophageal cancer: squamous cell carcinoma and adenocarcinoma. These two types look different from each other under the microscope.Squamous cell esophageal cancer is linked to smoking and drinking too much alcohol.Adenocarcinoma is the more common type of esophageal cancer. Having Barrett esophagus\u00a0increases the risk of this type of cancer.\u00a0Acid reflux disease (gastroesophageal reflux disease, or GERD) can develop into Barett esophagus. Other risk factors include smoking, being male, or being\u00a0obese.", "Prevention": "To reduce your risk of cancer of the esophagus:Do not smoke, Limit or do not drink alcoholic beverages, Get checked by your doctor if you have severe GERD, Get regular checkups if you have Barrett esophagus. "}, "Erection problems": {"description": "If you have trouble getting or keeping an erection more than 25% of the time, you should see your doctor.", "Possible Complications": "An erection problem that doesn't go away can make you feel bad about yourself. It can also harm your relationship with your partner. ED may be a sign of health problems such as diabetes or heart disease. So if you have an erection problem, do not\u00a0wait to seek help. ", "Symptoms": ["Trouble getting an erection", "Trouble keeping an erection", "Having an erection that is not firm enough for intercourse", "Less interest in sex "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will perform a physical exam, which may include:Taking your blood pressure, Examining your penis and rectum to check for problems . Your doctor will also ask questions to help find the cause, such as:Have you been able to get and keep erections in the past?, Are you having trouble getting an erection or keeping erections?, Do you have erections during sleep or in the morning?, How long have you had trouble with erections? . Your doctor will also ask about your lifestyle, as well.Are you taking any medicines, including over-the counter medicines and supplements?, Do you drink, smoke, or use recreational drugs?, What is your state of mind? Are you stressed, depressed, or anxious?, Are you having relationship problems? . You may have a number of different tests to help find the cause, such as:Urinalysis or blood tests to check for health conditions such as diabetes, heart problems, or low testosterone, A device you wear at night to check for normal nighttime erections, Ultrasound of your penis to check for blood flow problems, Rigidity monitoring to test how strong your erection is, Psychological tests to check for depression and other emotional problems . ", "Treatment": "The treatment may depend on what is causing the problem and how healthy you are. Your doctor can talk with you about the best treatment for you.For many men, lifestyle changes can help. These include:Getting exercise, Eating a healthy diet, Losing extra weight, Sleeping well . If you and your partner have trouble talking about your relationship, it may cause problems with sex. Counseling can help both you and your partner.Lifestyle changes alone may not be enough. There are many treatment options.Pills you take by mouth, such as sildenafil (Viagra), vardenafil (Levitra), and tadalafil (Cialis). They work only when you are sexually aroused. They usually start to work in 15 to 45 minutes., Medicine inserted into the urethra or injected into the penis to improve blood flow. Very small needles are used and don't cause any pain., Surgery to place implants in the penis. The implants may be inflatable or semi-rigid., A vacuum device: This is used to pull blood into the penis. A special rubber band is then used to keep the erection during intercourse., Testosterone replacement if your testosterone level is low. This comes in skin patches, gel, or injections into the muscle. . ED pills you take by mouth (Viagra, Levitra, or Cialis) can have side effects. These can range from muscle pain and flushing to heart attack. Do not use these drugs with nitroglycerin. The combination can cause your blood pressure to drop. You may not be able to use these drugs if you have any of the following conditions:Recent stroke or heart attack, Severe heart disease, such as unstable angina or irregular heartbeat (arrhythmia), Severe heart failure, Uncontrolled high blood pressure, Uncontrolled diabetes, Very low blood pressure . Other treatments also have possible side effects and complications. Ask your doctor to explain the risks and benefits of each treatment.You may see many herbs and supplements that claim to help sexual performance or desire. However, none have been proven to successfully treat ED. Plus, they may not always be safe. Do not take anything without talking with your doctor first.", "Causes": "To get an erection, your brain, nerves, hormones, and blood vessels all need to work together. If something gets in the way of these normal functions, it can lead to erection problems.An erection problem is usually not \"all in your head.\" In fact, most erection problems have a physical cause. Below are some common physical causes.Disease:Diabetes, High blood pressure, Heart or thyroid conditions, Clogged arteries (atherosclerosis), Depression, Nervous system disorders, such as multiple sclerosis or Parkinson's disease . Medicines:Antidepressants, Blood pressure medications (especially beta-blockers), Heart medications, such as digoxin, Sleeping pills, Some peptic ulcer medications . Other physical causes:Low testosterone levels: This can make it difficult to get an erection. It can also reduce a man's sex drive., Nerve damage from prostate surgery., Nicotine, alcohol, or cocaine use., Spinal cord injury. . In some cases, your emotions or relationship problems can lead to ED, such as:Poor communication with your partner., Feelings of doubt and failure., Stress, fear, anxiety, or anger., Expecting too much from sex: This can make sex a task instead of a pleasure. . Erection problems can affect men at any age, but are more common as you get older. Physical causes are more common in older men. Emotional causes are more common in younger men.If you have erections in the morning or at night while you sleep, it is likely not a physical cause. Most men have 3 to 5 erections at night that last about 30 minutes. Talk with your doctor about how to find out if you have normal nighttime erections.", "Prevention": "To help prevent erection problems:Quit smoking., Cut back on alcohol (no more than 2 drinks per day)., Do not use illegal drugs., Get plenty of sleep and take time to relax., Stay at a healthy weight for your height., Exercise and eat a healthy diet to keep good blood circulation., If you have diabetes, keep blood sugar well-controlled., Talk openly with your partner about your relationship and sex life. Seek counseling if you and your partner have trouble communicating. . "}, "Eosinophilic fasciitis": {"description": "The disease may look similar to scleroderma but is not related.", "Possible Complications": "Arthritis is a rare complication of eosinophilic fasciitis. Some people may develop very serious blood disorders or blood-related cancers, such as aplastic anemia or leukemia. The outlook is much worse if blood diseases occur.", "Symptoms": ["Bone pain or tenderness", "Carpal tunnel syndrome", "Muscle weakness", "Tenderness and swelling of the arms, legs and sometimes the joints", "Thickened skin that looks puckered"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Gamma globulins (a type of immune system cell), Erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), MRI, Muscle biopsy, Skin biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Corticosteroids and other immune-suppressing medicines are used to relieve symptoms. These medicines are more effective when started \u00a0early in the disease. Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) may also help reduce symptoms.", "Causes": "The cause of eosinophilic fasciitis is unknown. In people with this condition, white blood cells called eosinophils, build up in the muscles and tissues. Eosinophils are linked to allergic reactions. The syndrome is more common in people ages 30 to 60.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention."}}